Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Number of Reviews
36

Author
J.K. Salisbury
Recently, over on the Official Star Wars website, a teaser poster was shown,
spoofing the makers of Godzilla, saying "Plot Does Matter"  This statement has
seemingly been ignored for the most part, by summer movie makers.  To me, this
means that you have a sensible, cohesive plot, it doesn't have to be the focus
of the movie (i.e. in action movies, something to hold the  scenes together
whether they be action( Lethal Weapon 4) or comedy (There's Something About
Mary), or even, heaven forbid, the main focus of the movie (Truman Show, X-
Files).  Plots this summer have been as absent as Steven Seagal at the Oscar
podium, so I have to admire and applaud a movie, that teases action, and
delivers, surprisingly, more plot than expected.
The previews for Mask of Zorro, led me to believe that this would be an
action- packed, excitement extravangaza, with the pairing of Banderas, and
Hopkins, showing promise.  What was delivered, was a bit different.  Yes, the
action scenes are there, and they work magnificently, the sword fighting is
well choregraphed, Banderas shows a true talent combination of agility,
comedy, and emotion, while his chemistry with Sir Hopkins, worked quite well.
 You believed that they were teacher/mentor, with each respecting, yet
needing the other. The chemistry between Banderas, and Jones works as well,
staging the most sensual swordfighting scene that I've ever witnessed, (not
that I've seen many, but this one was quite intense), and most of all,
everyone here, seemed to be having fun.  Sometimes you can tell, if actors
are enjoying what they're doing, or just sleepwalking through to get a
paycheck, the good guys, with their agendas, the bad guys, as the foils (you
can almost see Stuart Wilson twisting his moustache in a Snidely Whiplash
manner)
My misgivings about this movie, regard the apparent identity crisis existing.
The story of Zorro is fairly well known, and here, we are given an
interesting twist regarding them.  But we are then deluged with plot.  The
makers of this movie, in my opinion, tried to cram too much plot in here. 
The focus of Zorro is to fight for the people who cannot for themselves, and
the movie establishes that.  But then it becomes a bit convoluted in creating
reasons for each character to fight on.
I believe that the opportunity to make an fun, swashbuckling, action movie,
existed here, and, when they focus on that fact, it's exactly what this movie
is, it is fun, I do recommend it, I just think they could've either decided to
focus solely on the plot, developing, etc, or use a lighter plot, to hold and
transition the action scenes.  I applaud the effort of the plot, showing that
someone in Hollywood still cares, but I just feel it could've been a little
more effectively executed.  Take this one in at a matinee
See more of my Reel Ramblings at
http://www.angelfire.com/ks/nearside/comingatt.html
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Steve Rhodes
     The young Zorro, played by a perfectly cast Antonio Banderas,
improves on the old game of strip poker.  He and his fetchingly
beautiful costar, Catherine Zeta-Jones as Elena, engage in strip
swordplay in a scene late in the new Zorro movie.  As Zorro wins the
match, Elena grabs a hat to cover herself just fast enough so that the
film can keep its PG-13 rating.  If the audience has by then grown
tired of this overly long and confusing production, this sensuous sword
fight will easily rejuvenate their interest in the movie.
     THE MASK OF ZORRO by GOLDENEYE's director Martin Campbell features
lavish sets and golden cinematography in addition to swashbuckling
action and an uncountable number of explosions.  The script by John
Eskow and GODZILLA's Terry Rossio and Ted Elliott is the film's low
point.  So confusing that you may never get straight who is fighting
whom and why, the movie is sorely in need of a narrator.  They open the
movie with a huge block of text which helps some if the audience can
remember it all.
     The good news is that swordmaster Bob Anderson choreographed the
sword fights beautifully.  As the press kit notes, he has spent over 50
years in the motion picture industry doing this - his first pupil being
the great Erroll Flynn.  You'll recognize Anderson's techniques and
style.
     As the movie opens, Zorro, played by the unlikely action hero
Anthony Hopkins, is fighting a hundred men in the town square.  The
peasants, who view him as their only savior, cheer his every movement.
With the athletic agility of the Power Rangers, he jumps and leaps to
evade capture.
     After he disappears, we learn that in real life he is the wealthy
Don Diego de la Vega, who lives in a gadget-laden mansion a la
Batman's.  When Governor Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson) and his men
burst in, Zorro's wife is killed and the governor takes Zorro's infant
daughter Elena to be raised as his own.  Zorro is thrown into prison,
supposedly forever.
     The movie then jumps twenty years into the future with a vastly
changed political situation in California, where the story is set.  It
is best to enjoy the fight sequences and ignore the bewildering
explanations of who is on what side and why.  Stick to the basic rule
that Zorro and the peasants are good and that anyone with money is bad,
and you'll be able to follow enough of the storyline to get you by.
     The old Zorro (Hopkins) escapes from prison in order to kill his
old tormentor, the governor, but he ends up training a new Zorro
(Banderas) instead.  Zorro the elder does not bother to teach Zorro the
younger about guns.  The other side can use them, but Zorros stick to
steel.
     Banderas with true comedic flair uses great bravado and lots of
luck but less than the requisite skill in his first attempts at
challenging dozens of men.  But like James Bond, the character Zorro
most resembles, he eventually becomes even more adept at fighting
crowds of men than his teacher.
     Most of the story is a rehash of numerous others.  Young Zorro,
for example, gets to impersonate a priest in the confessional.  Elena
confesses her impure thoughts about Zorro to the "priest," and, of
course, he wants details.  There is even a sexy dance scene concocted
especially for Banderas to demonstrate his dancing talents.  He is
showing Elena the latest dance craze from Madrid, you see.
     If you love swashbucklers or if you're a Banderas fan, you'll
probably want to put the movie in your must-see category.  Others can
use their own judgement.
     THE MASK OF ZORRO runs way too long at 2:16.  It is rated PG-13
for some intense action and violence and would be fine for kids around
9 or 10 and up.
     My son Jeffrey, age 9, said the movie was "really good" and gave
it ***.  He liked all of the swordplay, but was frightened by such
scenes as the realistic pickled head and hand in a jar.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Mask of Zorro (1998)
Antonio Banderas,  Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart Wilson, 
Matt Letscher, Maury Chaykin, Tony Amendola, Pedro Armendariz, L.Q. Jones,
 Jose Perez, William Marquez, Victor Rivers, Julietta Rosen. Screenplay, 
John Eskow, Ted Elliott, Terry Rossio, story by Elliott, Rossio, Randall 
Jahnson. Directed by Martin Campbell. 136 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 4 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
In response to the critical drubbing he received for "Armageddon," 
director Michael Bay pointed to the box office receipts and speculated 
that film critics may be out of touch with popular tastes. Hopefully, Bay 
will catch a screening of "The Mask of Zorro" and realize that it's still 
possible to make a rousing popcorn flick without treating your audience 
like wide-eyed rubes suffering from attention-deficit disorder.
Packed with action, intrigue, humor and romance, "The Mask of Zorro" has 
all the payoffs one expects from a contemporary big summer movie, with 
the style of a classic Errol Flynn swashbuckler. It's the kind of film 
that leaves you sighing at the end, not just out of satisfaction, but 
also in relief that they didn't screw it up. Put that in your rocket-
launcher and smoke it, Mr. Bay.
The prologue begins in 1821, when two young brothers help Zorro prevent 
the execution of a group of peasants. We learn that Zorro is the 
aristocratic Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins), mortal enemy of vile 
Spanish governor Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson). Just when the 
triumphant Don Diego is ready to retire and devote himself to his wife 
and young daughter, Montero invades his home and exacts a horrifying 
revenge.
Twenty years later, Montero returns with a new scheme for power. The 
aging Zorro recruits one of the brothers who helped him so long ago, 
outlaw Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas), and trains him to continue 
his legacy. Complicating things is the presence of the beautiful Elena 
(Catherine Zeta-Jones), Don Diego's daughter, who Montero kidnapped and 
raised as his own.
"The Mask of Zorro" works because it takes the time to actually set up 
the story, and the trouble to create three-dimensional characters whose 
fates matter to the viewer. Having a whale of a cast doesn't hurt, either.
Anthony Hopkins is wonderful as the graying hero. His Zorro is noble, 
witty and just a bit full of himself. He insists on perfection as he 
trains young Murrieta, and has the strength of character to make you 
understand why the bandit obeys.
As the new Zorro, Antonio Banderas shines in a role he was born to play. 
Rakishly handsome, Banderas convinces both as an outlaw and later, as a 
hero. His Murrieta has a rough-hewn sense of style and a chip on his 
shoulder that Don Diego is more than happy to knock off. The two men work 
well together, despite their clashing egos. 
Catherine Zeta-Jones proves that she's more than just an incredibly 
beautiful face as the smoldering Elena. Clearly her father's daughter, 
her fiery eyes glisten with defiance and intelligence. Sparks quickly fly 
between her and the dashing Murrieta, adding sexual chemistry to the 
film's mixture of passion and derring-do.
Of course, characters as rich as these need a juicy villain and Stuart 
Wilson gives them one as Montero, investing him with enough humanity to 
make his wicked deeds all the more horrifying.
Director Martin Campbell does an exceptional job bringing the script to 
life, giving the production a rich, fluid feel as he dances between 
heroics, romance and humor. The stunts and sword fights have a snap to 
them and the audience truly becomes involved in the action, even at its 
most far-fetched, thanks in large part to the passion given the 
characters. As opposed to typical summer entertainment, "Zorro" has only 
one big explosion. That one explosion pays off beautifully, because the 
filmmakers understand that restraint always works better than overkill.
At 136 minutes, "The Mask of Zorro" is just a little too long. As good as 
the sword fights and narrow escapes are, a few less would have helped 
this larger-than-life adventure. But that's small criticism for the first 
summer popcorn movie of 1998 to fully deliver all it promised. 

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Antonio Banderas; Anthony Hopkins; Catherine Zeta-Jones; Stuart
Wilson & Matthew Letscher
The Mask Of Zorro is by far the best movie of the summer of 98. While
Armageddon and Deep Impact wowed we the audience with spectacular special
effects, no other movie was as much fun as Zorro. I've never been a big
Antonio Banderas fan -- actually to be perfectly honest I've never thought
that he could act his way out of a paper bag. Maybe in retrospect that's
because he has never had the right roles. There is no doubt that he was very
good in The Mask Of Zorro. It takes real talent to shine when you are acting
next to Anthony Hopkins in a movie. Hopkins plays Zorro, who, after being
imprisoned by the Spanish government escapes to try to make contact with the
daughter (Catherine Zeta-Jones) who was taken from him many years ago when
she was just an infant. Now, many years later she is all grown up. And may I
be the first to say WOW! Catherine Zeta Jones has got to be one of the most
beautiful women that I have seen in a movie in a long time, and unlike some
of the other lovely starlets that populate today's movies, Zeta-Jones is
actually a very good actress. But I digress. Hopkins meets up with a thief
(Antonio Banderas) who has a score to settle with some of the same people
that Zorro does. Since Zorro is now in his late 50's, he really can't don
the mask anymore, so he sets out to train Banderas' character to replace him
as Zorro. Going into much more detail would probably ruin the movie, but
lets just say that tons of sword fighting and other assorted action abound
in this movie.
I can't say enough about how impressed I was with Banderas' performance. He
was charismatic and funny, and if he can continue to find roles as good as
The Mask Of Zorro, he will undoubtedly become one of Hollywood's biggest
stars. As usual, Hopkins gave a tremendous performance, and manages to make
a role his own to the point where you could never imagine another actor
playing that role.
I can't say enough good things about The Mask Of Zorro. It was funny; well
acted; great sets; the fights were well choreographed and Catherine
Zeta-Jones, well, I could go on for hours about her. Do yourself a favor. Go
see this movie.

Author
Matt Williams
After quite an extended absence from the screen, Zorro has returned in
the brand new adventure.  The Mask of Zorro typifies what a good summer
popcorn movie can be:  an action-packed adventure with an actual plot
and interesting characters!
The film opens in the final days of the Mexican revolution.  The Spanish
governor of California, Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), has done his
best to oppress the people and support the aristocracy.  The people's
only hope comes from the masked swashbuckler, Zorro (Anthony Hopkins).
Don Rafael vows to destroy Zorro with one final plan, before he is
forced to leave his governorship.
Flash forward twenty years.  Don Rafael has returned to California, now
under Mexican rule, with a new scheme that will enable him to rule once
again.  Twenty years older, Zorro is in no shape to oppose him... so
Zorro sets about finding a replacement.
He finds Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas), a common thief in whom he
spies the seeds of talent.  But can Alejandro learn the talents of Zorro
in time to defeat Montero's evil schemes?  And can he place the needs of
the people before his own personal quest for vengeance?
Both Anthony Hopkins and Antonio Banderas are impressive as the
respective Zorros.  Both men embody a certain air of adventure
appropriate for the role. Hopkins gives the elder Zorro wisdom, whereas
Banderas is given a much broader range, from comedy to romance.
Cast as the younger Zorro's love interest, Catherine Zeta-Jones is able
to keep apace with the fiery Banderas, whether on the dance floor or in
a seductive swordfight.  The weakest links would have to be the
villains, Stuart Wilson as Don Rafael, and his crony Capt. Harrison Love
(Matt Letsher). They are not poor adversaries, but neither can hold a
candle to Zorro.
Director Martin Campbell, who directed Goldeneye, approaches The Mask of
Zorro with much the same style.  The end result feels much like a
period-set Bond film, starring a suave superhuman hero, and filled with
outlandish stunts.  This approach actually works refreshingly well, and
puts to rest the notion that any modern Zorro film would have to seem
dated.
The stuntwork throughout The Mask of Zorro is superb, with the high
point being the film's numerous swashbuckling sequences.  Sure, at times
things tend to get a little unbelievable, but you are too swept up in
the film's atmosphere to notice.
In a mostly disappointing summer (so far), The Mask of Zorro is finally
a summer movie that lives up to its promise.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
The reason why the movie industry continues to set box office records
every year is due to one thing: tradition.  Motion pictures have not
lost their way in telling stories that are set in the present while
mixing them perfectly with stories from the past. Look at all of the
films to win the Best Picture Oscar in the 1990's.  Only one film, 'The
Silence of the Lambs', is set in the present day and of all the films to
win the award in the 1980's, only two, 'Ordinary People' and 'Rain Man',
are set totally in the present day.  People were fascinated to learn the
story of 'Titanic' and while that film had a fictional backdrop, it
still managed to put forward a harrowing climax, detailing the final
hours of the great ship's demise.  It has become the highest grossing
film of all time and shares the most Oscars ever won, 11, with 1959's
'Ben-Hur'.
The only film I've ever seen that I really liked Antonio Banderas in was
1996's 'Evita'.  Banderas didn't have a large enough part in 1993's
'Philadelphia' to really make an impact and he has found true stardom
with 'The Mask of Zorro'.  I was struck by the fact that in a recent
interview with Banderas, he stated that he is the first Spanish actor to
play the swashbuckling hero and that lends even more credibility to the
part and in fact, the entire cast is excellent in a film that follows a
Hollywood formula of good guys vs. bad guys and the film makes certain
that there is a beautiful woman involved.
The film opens in 1821, and Don Diego De La Vega (Anthony Hopkins) wears
the mask of Zorro, defender of Mexico, and battles the corrupt forces of
Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson).  Don Rafael has selected three
innocent men from the town square to be executed, all for the sake of
drawing Zorro out in public so his soldiers can kill him.  The men are
of course saved and the scene has enthralling energy and grand style as
the hero shows up the villains but not all is pretty.  As Don Rafael
seeks out the true identity of Zorro later in the day, he finds it is
Don Diego and in a terrible accident, Diego's wife is killed during his
apprehension and Don Raphael takes the infant daughter of Don Diego away
and claims her for himself and raises the little girl on his own.  Don
Diego returns some twenty years later after his time in prison, and his
daughter is now a grown woman (Catherine Zeta Jones) and Don Diego seeks
revenge against Don Rafael and a reunion with his daughter.  He may have
found it in Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas), a man who as a child
along with his brother, saved Zorro's life.  Murrieta's brother is
cornered by Captain Harrison Love (Matt Letscher) and takes his own life
instead of being captured and eventually tortured.  Captain Love is
working directly with Don Rafael in a gold mining plot swindle that will
mean both their lives if they are exposed.  Murietta as every reason to
want the same revenge as Don Diego.
Banderas and Hopkins work well together in this film.  Too old to truly
be the dashing hero he once was, Hopkins trains Banderas to be the new
generation of justice and eventually wear the mask of Zorro for his very
own.  My only complaint with the film is that it seemed that Banderas
learned the art of Zorro's defence just a little too quickly and while
eventually convincing, the film does balance this by showing him in
battle at times being a little wet behind the ears with an aloof sense
of duty in his first couple of tries.
Director Martin Campbell ('GoldenEye', 'No Escape') doesn't trivialize
the characters for the sake of action and adventure.  There is a good
human story contained within the film and one of the movie's executive
producers is Steven Spielberg and the old time historical significance
in the film and the straight action scenes put me in mind at times of
'Raiders of the Lost Ark'.  I was truly impressed with all members of
the cast and the seasoned qualities of Anthony Hopkins are again
diversified as he is the foundation of the film and continues to
solidify his reputation as both a movie star and truly great actor.
'The Mask of Zorro' is a dazzling and highly entertaining movie and what
a pleasure to watch a film that is completely loaded with action without
any computerized special effects.  If there are any in the film, they
certainly don't need to be there as the film would have been capable of
generating its own sense of wonder and tension without them.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Author
Marty Mapes
** (out of 4) Lots of overacting. Lots of clichés. Lots of fun. 
Two out of three ain't good. In school, it'll earn you a D. 
Anthony Hopkins plays the aging masked avenger in this perennially remade
movie. Hoping to draw Zorro out of hiding, the villainous governor Don
Rafael (Stuart Wilson) has chosen three peasants at random to be hanged. His
plot works. Zorro arrives to free the peasants. But Rafael's trap is not
quick enough or strong enough to hold this hero. Setting the overblown,
clichéd tone of the movie, Zorro ascends a staircase in front of the setting
sun and poses, yes, poses for the cheering masses. 
Later that evening, Don Diego (Zorro's alter ego) comes home, through his
unnecessarily Bat-Cave-like secret passageways, to his loving wife and
infant daughter. His wife has been worried about his dangerous heroics, and
she urges him to hang up his sword. He admits he's getting too old for this
work, so he promises he'll quit. 
Before they can celebrate his retirement, Don Rafael shows up with his
militia looking for Zorro. A wound from the day's battle gives away Diego's
secret identity. Rafael's man kills Diego's wife while Rafael throws him in
prison and carries away his beautiful daughter. 
Twenty years later, we are introduced to two thieves, brothers from the same
village as Diego. One is killed by the zealous Captain Love (Matthew
Letscher), and the other, Alejandro (Antonio Banderas), vows revenge.
Alejandro is falling-down drunk when he next sees the captain, but he cannot
let the opportunity for revenge slip by. He's about to charge when, out of
nowhere, Diego disarms him. 
Diego, who has escaped from prison, recognizes Alejandro's potential. He
sees an opportunity to pass the mask and sword to the next generation, so he
gets Alejandro sobered up and takes him under his wing. 
Coincidentally, the villain Rafael is returning from Spain after twenty
years away. Even more coincidentally, he gets involved in an illegal
land-grab scheme with the aid of Captain Love. 
Two heroes. Two villains. Two noble opportunities for revenge. I bet you can
guess how it all ends. 
Clearly, this film is meant to be a melodrama. Love, villainy, and honor are
all exaggerated. But melodrama is hard to pull off. TITANIC did it fairly
well, but even it carried the melodrama too far, in the inhuman callousness
of its villain. Needless to say, THE MASK OF ZORRO is no TITANIC. In this
film, the melodrama is often eyeball-rolling ridiculous, like Zorro posing
in front of the sunset, or Rafael's random execution of peasants. 
In addition, the movie has cartoonish set pieces which, funny as they may
be, make the movie a lot less consistent. (Think of Yosemite Sam when you
watch the film and you'll see what I mean.) Campbell knows that he's
directing a "summer blockbuster" and doesn't even try to make a solid movie.
Instead, he just goes for obligatory skits, loosely held together by the
Zorro story. 
That's not to say the movie can't be fun, but it will require that you check
your brain with the usher. Perhaps if I had known this beforehand, I could
have enjoyed it more. 
Some of these skits actually won me over. Anytime there was a swordfight, it
was worth watching. Anytime a horse was on screen, it was worth watching
(there were some very good stunts). Any time Banderas was allowed to pour on
the charm, it was worth watching. Add this all up and you have a fair amount
of screen time. 
But you don't have 136 minutes. What's left is enough time to notice, and
ponder, several of the movie's faults. 
Ordinarily I wouldn't mention set design unless it was good, but even in
this motley patchwork of a movie, it stuck out like a sore thumb. As stated
above, Diego has secret Batman tunnels in his mansion. It is an unimportant
detail, and it should have been left out. It made Hopkins look silly and it
didn't add to the character's depth. All it accomplished was to draw
attention to the bad set design. 
The other instance that jumped out was near the end of the film, when
hundreds of peasant miners are locked in wooden cages that appear to be
recycled from WATERWORLD. The plot tells us that these cages were built for
a one-time use, on a limited budget, by near-slave labor, yet these
"makeshift" cages have the look of professionally built Hollywood sets. This
might not have been so noticeable had not the camera and plot kept focusing
our attention on them. 
The screenplay has problems too. One problem is the patchwork makeup of the
film - six writers contributed to the screenplay (along with a seventh
uncredited writer, according to the IMDB). One moment the movie is a comedy,
the next it is a noble adventure. There's no reason it can't be both, but
usually the mix is not so random or haphazard. 
Another script problem is the way the characters were written. Zorro is
supposed to be a hero for the people. Instead, both Zorros are extremely
self-centered. This is particularly clear at the end. Hundreds of doomed
peasants fill the well-built cages, but instead of freeing them, both Zorros
pick grudge fights with their personal nemeses, leaving these apparently
helpless miners trapped. 
And finally the soundtrack, which was so promising early on, sold itself out
at the film's conclusion. There was some excellent flamenco music during
several of the movie's swordfights. The syncopated sounds of guitar, claps,
and stamps added a nice spicy flavor not only to the scenes but to the film
as a whole. And then, as the credits start to roll, out comes a soulless
white-bread pop song, sprinkled with a tiny dash of off-brand, extra-mild
salsa. It was a weak choice that gave the movie a disappointingly bland,
dull aftertaste. 
For me, the clichés and cheap laughs belied a shoddy, aimless movie. But if
you shop around for reviews, you will find that nearly everyone liked this
movie better than I did. More power to them, and to you if you go.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matt Letscher
Director: Martin Campbell
Screenplay: John Eskow and Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
There are old films, and then there are films that capture the spirit of
decades ago perfectly.  The Mask of Zorro is one of these; it is
spellbinding and old fashioned, containing every element of a
traditional superhero film.  It is how these elements are balanced by
director Martin Campbell that makes Zorro a non-stop feast for the
senses, and the clever handling of its script makes it one of the
unexpected highlights of 1998.
Colombia Tri-Star delayed the release of Zorro for well over a year,
allegedly due to the success of Titanic.  I don't see why, since this
film is better than blockbusters Godzilla and Armageddon put together,
and I haven't been this mesmerized by a purebred action flick since John
Woo's Face/Off in 1997.  Much of the credit goes to Martin Campbell, who
made 1995's Goldeneye - one of the best James Bond films ever.  Campbell
refrains from using crafty camera angles and excessive special effects;
instead he focuses on genuine, exciting action.  The result is breath
taking.  Zorro's many sword fights are captured incredibly on screen,
with clashes and clangs bringing hoots and thrills from the audience.
Anothony Hopkins plays Don Diego de la Vega, an elderly Zorro, who is a
masked hero that fights for the people of Mexico.  After a plight to
save innocent peasants,
Don Diego's archenemy Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson) captures and
imprisons him, and forcefully adopts his daughter Elena (Catherine Zeta
Jones) and raises her as his own. Two decades later Mexico has still not
forgotten the legend of Zorro, but when Don Diego escapes from jail, he
realizes he is far too old to continue the never-ending fight for
independence and justice.  Enter Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas), a
bandit who suffers from the death of his brother at the hands of Captain
Harrison Love (Matt Letscher).  Don Diego transforms Murieta into the
new Zorro, and teaches him that the best way to avenge his brother's
death is to live to celebrate it.
Campbell balances the spectacular action with drama and comedy, and the
mixture is always entertaining.  Whilst Murieta learns how to sword
fight, he also learns how to be a gentlemen, and that revenge can often
lead to good things.  In one of the film's touching moments, the primary
meaning behind wearing a black mask is revealed, and Murieta learns that
not only does the mask hide his identity, it also hides his hatred.
Few actors can maintain a respectable presence while working with
Anthony Hopkins, one of the true masters of American cinema.  He gives
power, presence and experience to his roles and is a lifeboat for many
movies.  Hopkins saved Amistad from being a total disaster, and is still
remembered for his difficult (and Oscar winning) part in Silence of the
Lambs.  However as the young Zorro, Antonio Banderas almost steals the
show, with a sparkling and exciting performance that is almost always on
cue (though sometimes he seems all too aware of his heroic guise).  The
beautiful Catherine Zeta-Jones is charming in her first film role, and
the sexual chemistry between her and Banderas is successfully steamy.
The key to how very gratifying The Mask of Zorro is lies in Campbell's
mixture and pace of plot elements.  With a running time of 137 minutes,
he paces the story slowly and allows setting and character to be
developed at a comfortable speed.  How he achieved that without making
one boring moment is quite amazing, but Zorro has more immediate
benefits than just a pleasing atmosphere.  This celebrated tale is told
with pizzazz and artistry, and never pretends to be anything more than
it is - an old fashioned tale of love, hatred, devotion and revenge.
The Mask of Zorro has all the spectacle of an epic, and all the heart of
a classic tale that will never be outdated.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Michael Dequina
Despite numerous vehicles designed to break him out of the fold, Antonio
Banderas still remains right on the cusp of major Hollywood stardom.  He
came out with both guns blazing in _Desperado_, yet he didn't exactly blow
away the box office; Rebecca DeMornay literally sunk her teeth into his
naked ass in _Never_Talk_to_Strangers, but he himself came away with
nothing to chew on; he rode Sylvester Stallone's fast-falling coattails in
_Assassins_; no one cared to see how he and his current wife, Melanie
Griffith, met on the job in _Two_Much_.  Now, holding some momentum after
his well-received supporting turn in _Evita_, Banderas has his best--and,
perhaps, last--shot at Tinseltown superstardom, the rousing romantic
adventure _The_Mask_of_Zorro_.
In a season and an age ruled by action films reliant on post-production
effects, the barebones approach of an old fashioned swashbuckler is rather
refreshing.  As this update of Johnston McCulley's enduring character
begins, the legendary masked, sword-wielding defender of the weak and
oppressed is really one Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins), aiding
Mexico's independence effort against Spain.  His double life is soon
discovered by the evil Spanish governor Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson),
who kills de la Vega's wife Esperanza (Julietta Rosen), throws him in
prison, and claims their infant daughter, Elena, as his own.  Twenty years
later, de la Vega escapes, at roughly the same time Montero returns from
Spain to the now-independent Mexico with the grown Elena (Catherine
Zeta-Jones) in tow.  Montero, of course, has a dirty scheme up his sleeve,
and seeing that he is a bit long in the tooth to reassume the mask of
Zorro, grooms young, scruffy, revenge-minded bandit Alejandro Murieta
(Banderas) to take his place.
Naturally, this sets the stage for extended training sequences, which are
far from anything new but made watchable by some funny repartee written by
scripters John Eskow, Ted Elliot, and Terry Rossio; and the effortless
mentor-student rapport between Hopkins and Banderas.  Unlike some films,
though, while Alejandro pretty much passes his training, he still does not
perfect certain things (namely, horseback riding) which gives this fantasy
some element of reality--and keeps the film from taking itself too
seriously.  It's this lighthearted, light-on-its-feet tone that makes
_Zorro_ such agreeable entertainment.  Director Martin Campbell delivers
the goods in the many exciting swordfights throughout the movie, but he
also displays a nice, breezy touch throughout, particularly in the scene
that received the biggest crowd response: a cute and sexy
swordplay-as-foreplay scene between Alejandro and Elena.
Although the Alejandro-Elena romance is somewhat underwritten, the pairing
comes to life, thanks to palpable chemistry between Banderas and the
breathtaking Zeta-Jones, who share a sensual dance scene midway through the
film.  Actually, Banderas heightens the energy level of every scene he's
in.  He has always been a charismatic screen presence, but he has never
been quite so charmingly roguish and playful, which is perfectly suited to
the character.  Also well-cast is Hopkins, who appears to be having a ball
taking on a more physical role for a change.  Less effective, though, is
the casting of the villains.  Wilson is only slightly more menacing than
the weak brand of villainy he leant _Lethal_Weapon_3_, and Matt Letscher,
playing the military captain who killed Alejandro's brother (hence the new
Zorro's thirst for vengeance), seems no match for the masked swordsman.
While _Armageddon_ and _Lethal_Weapon_4_ pummel moviegoers with mayhem
(and quite effectively, at that), it's almost soothing to watch an action
film as comparatively laid-back as _The_Mask_of_Zorro_.  It is a fairly
relaxed yet confident, competent entertainment, one that is not afraid to
bypass a hard sell and allow its innate charms to elegantly seduce its
audience.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Christopher Null
     With all the recent rehashing of old movies and T.V. series, (anyone
catch the new TARZAN movie?) you wouldn't be blamed if you didn't expect too
much from this one.  But on the bright side, this one does have Anthony
Hopkins taking on an entirely new ethnicity, which is always interesting.
     Hopkins's performance aside, THE MASK OF ZORRO somehow managed to keep
itself afloat despite steamrolling through almost every action movie cliche
in the books.  In retrospect, ZORRO never loses its freshness precisely
because we are continually presented with new formations of the action movie
spectacle in a genre we haven't seen much of in a while.  Part ROBIN HOOD,
part disaster movie, part young warrior in training movie, another part
ROBIN HOOD, ZORRO seems to take the most classical elements of all of these
action genres and put them together in a way that we know we've seen it all
before, yet still enjoy the ride.
     None of this is to say that THE MASK OF ZORRO is a film masterpiece. 
Despite a strong performance by the hit-and-miss Antonio Banderas and an
enchanting turn by Catherine Zeta-Jones as the princess/noble woman/whatever
with a heart of gold, this film subjugates emotion to action.  So don't
expect to be swashbuckling out of the theater.
Director: Martin Campbell
Producer: Doug Claybourne, David Foster
Writer: John Eskow, Ted Elliott, Terry Rossio
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta-Jones
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/zorro/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     I think I qualify as a Zorro fan.  When I finally finished the
serial SON OF ZORRO last month I had seen every live-action Zorro film
or serial ever released in the English language.  And I am one-up on
even some of the most confirmed Zorro fans, having found and read THE
CURSE OF CAPISTRANO by Johnston McCulley years ago.  [It was nearly
impossible to find until its paperback reprint this year as THE MARK OF
ZORRO.]  The legend of El Zorro, the Fox, began when Johnston
McCulley's story was serialized in five parts starting August 9, 1919,
in ALL-STORY WEEKLY.  In the story the character of Zorro, dashing
outlaw on the side of good hiding behind the guise of the effete fop,
was almost a direct steal from the Baroness Orczy's Scarlet Pimpernel,
created in 1904.  The following year the story was made into the film
THE MARK OF ZORRO with Douglas Fairbanks, Sr.  The 1920 film was very
faithful to the novel, but it revealed much sooner who was behind the
mask so it would better show off Fairbanks's talents.  Through the
years Zorro has graced several English-language films, serials, and a
TV series. Zorro was the original "Caped Crusader" of American pop
culture and undoubtedly was part of the inspiration for Batman.  As
popular as he is in America, he is even more popular abroad and has
been portrayed in an astounding number of Italian, French, Spanish, and
Mexican films.  The most recent film version was the 1980 ZORRO, THE
GAY BLADE, a strained comedy starring George Hamilton.  Now Tristar
Pictures has brought back Zorro in a (mostly) serious film adventure.
     The film THE MASK OF ZORRO might more aptly be called THE RETURN
OF ZORRO.  Departing from the canon of the earlier stories Diego de la
Vega (also known as Zorro and played here by Anthony Hopkins) is
captured by an arch-enemy Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), the Spanish
Governor.  In the process Esperanza, Diego's wife whom both men loved,
is killed.  Rafael takes Diego's daughter Elena, adopting her as his
own, and returning to Spain.  Twenty years later the real story begins
with Rafael returning to California where Diego is still imprisoned.
Diego escapes and runs into Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas), a
young man that Diego had known before his imprisonment.  Murrieta has
turned into a somewhat incompetent bandit with a vendetta against
Captain Harrison Love (Matthew Letscher) who happens to be an ally of
Montero.  Diego decides not just to befriend this enemy of his enemy,
he decides to make the young man into a new Zorro.  Completing the set
of principles is Elena (Catherine Zeta Jones), a grown woman and
returned from Spain to be with Montero, whom she believes to be her
father.
     The script for THE MASK OF ZORRO was written by Terry Rossio, Ted
Elliott, and John Eskow, who seem most familiar with the Disney version
of Zorro.  At least, when they need to coin new names, they use Garcia
and Bernardo, taken from the Disney version.  The score by James Horner
makes heavy use of crisp flamenco rhythms.  But Horner had his work cut
out for him to try to match the great Alfred Newman score of the 1940
film THE MARK OF ZORRO.
     Anthony Hopkins proves once again how versatile an actor he is as
Diego de la Vega.  He does a decent job playing a dashing swordsman
considerably his junior.  It is obvious that he has a double for some
of the most vigorous scenes, but he is apparently doing much of his own
swordplay.  Antonio Banderas is to the best of my knowledge the first
Hispanic to play El Zorro on the American screen.  The character Zorro
has always been played with some wit, though a little less might have
been more.  Catherine Zeta Jones's Elena has more than sufficient fire
for the role.  Perhaps the best scene in the film is a quiet
conversation between her and Hopkins.  The film was directed by Martin
Campbell, best known for directing GOLDENEYE.
     Perhaps not everything works, as I relate in the spoiler section
to follow.  But as a Zorro fan I just know that had they called me in
as a consultant I could have fine-tuned this film to perfection.  There
was a lot that bothered me, but I still hope it makes a mint and we get
some more.  After all, you just can't have too many Zorro films, can
you?  I rate THE MASK OF ZORRO a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler...
     There is one very big hole in the plot. Rafael Montero intends to
buy California from Santa Ana in the name of the Spanish government,
but actually for himself.  I strongly doubt that Santa Ana would sell
in the first place even to the Spanish.  The US-Mexican War, 1846-8,
was fought to force Santa Ana to sell Texas and other territories to
the United States.  Santa Ana did not want to sell off his country.
But if Santa Ana agreed to sell California to Spain, then what?  When
he discovered the Spanish government knew nothing about the transaction
he would declare the sale null and void.  He would field an army
(probably with Don Rafael's own gold) and retake California.  If Don
Rafael had had the strength to defend California he would not have
needed the gold in the first place.  If he did not have the strength
the fact that had given Santa Ana some gold and lied about whom he
represented would have amounted to no more than a political
contribution.
     The climactic explosion would have killed all the laborers, at
least the way the sequence is edited.  In most films that would be a
problem.  Here I will consider it a nod to the impossible escapes in
the Zorro serials. Another problem with the plot is that at the end of
the film a lot of people know that there is sufficient gold in
California to make mining highly profitable.  California would have had
a very different history if that information were public so early.
     But not all my comments will be negative.  Usually the scripting
of this sort of film is straightforward and not very subtle.  I would
like to point out what I found a clever piece of plotting.  It was
going to come down to one man's word against another who Elena's father
was.  A lessor script might have left it strictly an emotional
decision.  The double coincidence that Diego is here with such a hatred
for her father and that Elena so resembles Esperanza is just too much
coincidence.  She might not know who her father is, but logically
Esperanza has to be her mother.
     The ending of the McCulley's Zorro was never quite satisfying.  He
was to become a wealthy landowner and "raise fat children."  There is
something satisfying in having Zorro not go gently into that good
night.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Martin Campbell
Cast:  Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matt Letscher
Screenplay:  Terry Rossio, Ted Elliott, John Eskow
Producers:  Doug Claybourne, David Foster
Runtime:  135 min.
US Distribution:  Sony Pictures/Tristar
Rated PG-13:  intense action and violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        The Mask of Zorro is a decent action picture, with an adequate script
and good acting.  The story is straightforward and cohesive, and the
characters are reasonably well-defined.  It's also a film that, aside
from the obvious effort that the performers have put into it, could have
been made by a machine on an action film assembly line.  Sometimes it's
thrilling, sometimes it's not, but it's always the same old action film
stuff -- simple entertainment and instantly forgettable.  Mix in some
irritating cliches common in Hollywood period pieces, and we have
another big, loud blockbuster that you'll stop thinking about thirty
seconds after the credits roll.
        Is that what you want?  I mean, is that what people in general want?  I
suppose that's possible; Armageddon, by comparison, is a film that
aspires to be about as much as this one does, but I found the asteroid
flick a lot more exciting and much more satisfying in the end.  Maybe
it's because this subject matter is so common (the film feels almost
exactly the same as The Man in the Iron Mask, and has many of the same
problems).  Maybe it's because I've already seen entire cities explode
this summer, and so seeing a mine blow up just isn't all that
thrilling.  Maybe it's because, once again, I've walked away from a
movie getting exactly what I expected to get.  Here's an official dare
to all mainstream directors -- try surprising me for a change!  
        I have no particular affinity towards the legends of the legendary
Zorro, but the story here seems like a nice one to continue the tale. 
It begins with Zorro himself as a middle-aged man, played by Anthony
Hopkins.  His real name is Don Diego, and his nemesis is Don Rafael
Montero (Stuart Wilson).  Montero loves Diego's wife, but, in a fatal
engagement, his guards kill her.  Montero has Diego imprisoned, and
takes Diego's young daughter to raise her himself.
        Twenty years pass, and focus is shifted to a young bandit, Alejandro
(Antonio Banderas) and his brother.  When his brother is killed by a
wicked general (Matt Letscher), Alejandro vows to take revenge.  That's
when he meets Diego, who has just escaped from prison.  It turns out
that the two knew each other when Alejandro was a child, and so Diego
decides to teach the young man how to fight.  The two men then help one
another to put their demons to rest, but not without the aide of a long
series of semi-interesting action sequences.
        The Mask of Zorro is not a dull picture.  Director Martin Campbell
(Goldeneye) seems to have a knack for observing characters who swiftly
overcome twenty-to-one odds and then smirk at their adversaries.  Some
of the sequences here are very well-staged -- I liked the scene that has
Zorro on the backs of multiple horses, as he overtakes a group of guards
from behind.  The final sequence is also well-done, and features a lot
of people falling from high places.  On a technical level, there's a lot
to admire here, such as the authentic sword battles and the impressive
sets.
        But very little of it had me gaping with amazement or shaking with
excitement.  The music and cinematography are both very routine, and
films like this are where film makers should go over-the-top with style
(as Michael Bay did in Armageddon).  Yes, it's fast-paced, and there are
enough explosions to hold the focus of even the most hopeless victims of
ADD.   I found the film pleasing to look at, but the only moments that
will be etched in my mind are the ones I saw twenty times in the
previews.  In addition, the script is not very witty, and lacks a
substantial amount of humor; the few laughs present are supplied by the
performers.
        Ironically, what I liked most about the picture is the acting and the
characters.  While the characters aren't strong, they are at least
consistent, and the exceptional cast is impressive.  Banderas is always
charming, and he's charming here, and wrings what humor he can out of
the script.  Hopkins forces us to care about his character; there's one
extremely touching scene that almost changed my entire view of the
film.  This scene also includes Catherine Zeta-Jones, who plays the
young lady to whom Montero has been lying for twenty years -- she is the
true daughter of Zorro.  Zeta-Jones is luminous and spunky in the role,
and holds up well against the pros.  Wilson is terrific, giving the
villain a little bit of depth, while Letscher has fun giving his villain
no positive attributes whatsoever.
        As a period piece, the film feels sloppy.  While Hopkins and Wilson are
both good, neither of them manage a Spanish accent, and therefore the
film never sounds authentic (even Banderas seems to be covering up his
natural inflection).  The dialogue is adequate, and while it never reeks
of anachronisms, there isn't a single line of memorable dialogue in the
film.  When all is considered, The Mask of Zorro is just another summer
blockbuster -- technically adequate but utterly methodical.  It's nice
to see a loud movie that isn't stupid, but this film just doesn't have
much of a personality.  

Author
Greg King
THE MASK OF ZORRO (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Martin Campbell
Stars: Anthony Hopkins, Antonio Bandera, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart 
Wilson, Matt Letscher, Maury 
Chaykin, Tony Amendola, Pedro Armendariz, L Q Jones, William Marquez, 
Jose Perez, Victor Rivers
Running time: 137 minutes
Lacking new ideas, producers have always found inspiration in
the past, plundering classic movies and tv series.  But, more often
than not, these contemporary remakes fail to capture the spirit of the
original and largely fall short of expectations.  Not so The Mask Of
Zorro, which revives the legendary character first created in 1919 by
crime writer Johnston McCulley.
This lavishly staged big budget adventure also remains
faithful to the spirit and flavour of those Zorro movies of yesteryear
which starred Douglas Fairbanks and Tyrone Power as the masked avenger
who fought against Spanish tyranny in nineteenth century California.
The first major Zorro movie produced in Hollywood for over forty
years, The Mask Of Zorro is an entertaining and crowd pleasing romp.
There are plenty of sword fights and chases throughout this pacy film.
Unlike most modern action films, the violence is low key and
restrained.  This updated Zorro also contains enough tongue in cheek
moments and sly humour to keep audiences chuckling throughout.
Spanish actor Antonio Banderas steps into the title role, and
he captures the flamboyant swashbuckling spirit of the film perfectly.
The film begins in 1821.  Don Diego (Anthony Hopkins), the
nobleman who fights injustice as Zorro, finds himself arrested by his
nemesis, Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson, from Lethal Weapon 3,
etc).  The despotic governor of California has been ordered to return
to Spain, and takes a cruel revenge on Zorro for past humiliations.
Don Diego's wife is killed and Don Rafael takes his baby daughter
Elena away to raise as his own.  Zorro himself is imprisoned, and the
potential for rebellion is crushed.
Twenty years later, Don Rafael returns with a nefarious scheme
to purchase California from Mexico.  Don Diego manages to escape from
prison, but he is too old and tired to continue the fight.  He trains
Alejandro Murrieta (Banderas), an incompetent and hot headed thief, to
become his protégé and don the guise of Zorro.  Once again the
legendary Zorro rides out to vanquish the enemy and offer the people
hope.
Brit Martin Campbell (who also directed Goldeneye, the best
Bond movie in two decades) is perfectly suited to the demands of the
action genre.  He maintains a rapid pace throughout, and the numerous
action scenes are superbly handled.  The sword duels are terrific
stuff, and staged with gusto.
Hopkins seems to be enjoying himself immensely in this rare
action outing, and he brings a touch of authority to his role as the
older Zorro.  He also manages to bring some emotional depth to his
performance that makes his tragic sorrow and personal vendetta
credible.
 His sword fight trainer, Bob 
Anderson, also worked with Erroll Flynn on The Master Of Ballantrae 
forty-five years ago.  
Banderas is perfectly cast as Zorro, and brings flair and a
swarthy sexuality and physical presence to the role.  In her first
major role, Zeta-Jones exudes a raw sexuality as the feisty Elena,
although her performance occasionally smacks of a contemporary
flavour.  Zeta-Jones and Banderas establish a wonderful chemistry, and
their scenes together positively smoulder and sparkle.
This modern remake of Zorro is cracking good fun, and
enormously entertaining.  One suspects that Fairbanks, Power, and even
tv's famous Zorro Guy Williams, would have approved wholeheartedly!

Author
Bob Bloom

 The Mask of Zorro (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Antonio Banderas,
Anthony Hopkins and Catherine Zeta-Jones.
 The Mask of Zorro is everything you'd want a swashbuckler to be.
 A tale filled with romance, daring deeds, spectacular stunts, stunning
swordplay, dashing heroes, dastardly villains, all done on a
larger-than-life tableaux with a sly bit of tongue-in-cheek.
 This rousing adventure spans 20 years and tells of the aged Don Diego de
la Vega (Anthony Hopkins), the original Zorro, who after languishing in
prison for 20 years escapes and finds an apt pupil, Alejandro Murieta
(Antonio Banderas), to train and take his place. Think of it as a
19th-century "Rapier Kid."
 Don Diego seeks revenge against Don Raphael Montero (Stuart Wilson) who,
as the despised governor of California 20 years earlier, was responsible
for the death of Don Diego's wife, killed in the struggle to capture Zorro.
 Montero, who fled to Spain with Elena, Diego's baby daughter, has returned
to California with the now-grown girl who believes the villain is her
father. Montero's scheme is to buy California from Mexico and establish an
independent nation with himself as leader.
 Thwarting him at every turn is the new, young Zorro, Alejandro, trained by
Diego to be a "servant of the people," to protect them and right wrongs.
 Under the able direction of Martin Campbell (Goldeneye), The Mask of Zorro
is a sweeping adventure with an old-fashioned sensibility, recalling the
days when Errol Flynn and Douglas Fairbanks (Sr. and Jr.) picked up a sword
to defend the helpless, protect the crown and defeat all blackguards.
 However, the movie does offer a nod to the '90s. Elena (the stunning
Catherine Zeta-Jones) is a spunky lass who speaks her mind and can handle a
sword as well as any man.
 Hopkins is wise, patient and determined as the aged Diego, passing on not
only his knowledge of how to handle a sword and whip, but how to outfox the
opposition to his hot-headed student.
 Banderas is charming, a bit self-depreciating and charismatic as the new
man in black. He handles a sword with skill, dances well and woos Elena
with panache and wit.
 Wilson is a fine, brains heavy who leaves much of the dirty work to his
murderous aide, Capt. Love (the handsome and chilling Matt Letscher).
 The duels are exciting and flashy, enhanced by a wonderfully full score by
Academy Award-winner James Horner.
 The Mask of Zorro is a grand time, filled with colorful characters and
grand landscapes. It recalls a time when movies were magical.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
You can e-mail him at bloom@journal-courier.com or at cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 14 July 1998 with Andrea and Patrick at the UA 64th and Second.
Studio preview.
The Zorro tale has been treated more than two dozen times in movies, since
the silent days. I was not completely familiar with it, though, and until
recently the most exposure I had to it was my plate-and-mug set from
childhood. I liked the marketing, so it follows I would like the movie
too.
The previews for *The Mask of Zorro* were quite long and practically gave
away the whole movie. So I thought I knew what to expect. I was wrong.
There was a lot more intelligence and thought in this recent incarnation.
It's got a lot of humor and wit to go along with all the swashbuckling and
swaggering. 
There is some heavyhandedness, melodrama, and even some outright
silliness, but the movie is enjoyable nonetheless. It is fast-paced and
engaging. Perfect for a summer movie, and a lot more rollicking than any
of those comets or lizards bent on destroying New York City.
The story is your basic good-versus-evil tale. Don Rafael Montero (Stuart
Wilson) is an inate baddie who is raping the resources of Mexican-held
California in 1821. He is more than willing to kill innocents to lure the
mysterious Zorro out into the open. But Zorros is able to fend off
countless attackers with vigor and swordsmanship. He gets a little help
from the Murrieta brothers along the way.
Flash ahead to 20 years later. Don Rafael has arrested Don Diego de la
Vega (Anthony Hopkins) and absconded to Spain with Elena de la Vega as his
own daughter. But he returns as governor of California and brings her
fully grown back (with Catherine Zeta-Jones as the full-figured Elena)
with him. De la Vega gets out of prison and is seeking revenge. Along the
way he re-encounters the grown-up Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas),
now an ungroomed horsethief. A tale of revenge and honor ensues, as worthy
of the tradition as other tales of this ilk, like the better known *Count
of Monte Cristo*. Both Zorros are heroes to the people; the elder Zorro is
a rich man who doesn't have to help anyone, but follows a higher moral
code. I guess that's what makes him so sexy. That, and long hair. It all
depends on whom is asked.
While Don Rafael and a younger baddie, Captain Love (Matthew Letscher)
scheme to use California gold to buy the land from the Mexican government,
using natives to mine in in concentration-camp-like conditions, de la Vega
mentors Murrieta in swordsmanship and charm so they can both exact revenge
on their mortal enemies. These are among the most enjoyable scenes. 
There is a lot of swordplay and impossible escapes in *The Mask of Zorro*,
some of them very comic. Some of them are also very heartstopping. It is
all abetted by great music and lavish costumes and set design.
Hopkins is by far the best actor in the bunch. Catherine Zeta Jones is
rather good also (watch for her "cleavage stage right" scene). Bandaras is
pretty good too; it's hard to believe, sometimes, that he's not just there
to look good and make a good percentage of the audience pant with sexual
desire. He's not a bad actor, but he's no Anthony Hopkins, who's not made
a bad movie for the past decade. But, Hopkins and Bandaras are both worthy
successors to the mantle first made famous by Douglas Fairbanks in the
silent era. He did his own stunts though. Today a small army is on hand to
help in that department. 
Directed by Martin Campbell; original music by James Horner; production
design by Cecilia Montiel; costume design by Graciela Mazón.
Audience Note: A woman in front of us actually *gasped* when Don Rafael
opened a box to reveal a single bar of gold. Andrea and I could not stop
laughing.
Historical Note: Four years after the fictional Zorro story ends, the US
steals half or Mexico or more and we all lived happily ever after. Except
for the Mexicans. 
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
ram@csb.stanford.edu
The Mask of Zorro
http://www.ram.org/ramblings/movies/the_mask_of_zorro.html
I used to read a lot of Zorro comic books, and like Batman and
Phantom, Zorro is a normal human without any extraordinary super powers
fighting to overcome injustice and oppression.  /The Mask of Zorro/ is
an exciting tale that occurs a bit after the original Zorro years, and
unlike recent movies about the other two characters, this one is done
more in the style of the early novels and comic books.
The film begins in 1821 (the Zorro character himself was introduced in
1919). Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins), the original Zorro, is
finally baited and captured by his arch enemy Don Rafael Montero
(Stuart Wilson). Montero's attempt to capture Zorro results in de la
Vega's wife being killed and Montero adopts de la Vega's infant
daughter as his own.
Fast forward twenty years. Montero returns from exile with an evil
plot to turn California into an independent Republic.  This enrages de
la Vega who escapes from prison and begins planning his revenge.  He
runs into Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas) who once help saved
Zorro's life and who now has a grudge against Montero's right-hand
man.  De la Vega begins training Murrieta to become his successor and
Murrieta begins wearing the mask and thwarting Montero's plans.  As he
does this, Montero's adopted daughter Elena (Catherine Zeta-Jones),
who is now all grown up (and how), runs into the new Zorro and sparks
fly. You can fill in the blanks.
The action in the film is cheesy, but it is good cheese. It is
refreshing to see that, in this day where action scenes involve
numerous explosions and crashes and death-defying stunts, the scenes
in /The Mask of Zorro/ rely on good old-fashioned choreography and
inventiveness to liven things up. In particular, the scenes are all
done comic-book style, where things happen that are highly unrealistic
but are acceptable only from a panel-by-panel perspective (for
example, the classic use of Zorro's sword as though it were a man to
mark whatever he chooses).  The acting is pretty good, and both
Banderas and Zeta-Jones are good looking people with plenty of
charisma and chemistry.  The dialogue is humourous and irreverent and
the naturally-filmed cinematography is bright and attractive.
Due to rather odd circumstances, I only got to see the second half of
/The Mask of Zorro/ and what I saw was pretty cool. Definitely worth
renting.


Author
Jamey Hughton
The popularity of the masked sword-fighter Zorro has plummeted since his
rise to fame in the 1930's. With the appearance of famed superheroes
Batman and Superman in their first feature-length films, Zorro had to
take a back seat. After all, he had no super powers. With the release of
the swashbuckling epic The Mask of Zorro, the franchise has been
revitalized with more potential than anyone had originally foreseen.
As if one Zorro was not exciting enough, The Mask of Zorro gives us two.
The original man in black is Don Diego De La Vega (Anthony Hopkins), a
savior of the Mexican people. In a thrilling prologue, De La Vega is
thwarting the plans of the greedy and careless governor of Mexico, Don
Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson). Afterward, like a medieval Batman riding
a horse through the caves and back to his mansion, we meet his wife
Esperenza and beautiful baby daughter lying peacefully in her crib. But
Montero somehow traces his steps, and Esperenza is accidentally killed
in a struggle. De La Vega is sent of to prison, and Montero whisks his
daughter away to raise her as his own.
Twenty years later, De La Vega finds the chance to escape from prison
once he learns that Montero is back, and has plans to make California
into an Independent Republic. While at first De La Vega plots instant
revenge on his sworn enemy, he sees his daughter (Catherine Zeta-Jones),
now fully grown and by Montero's side. He can't bring himself to finish
the deed with such personal issues now in consideration.
Luckily for De La Vega, another young rogue exists that has a personal
grudge against Montero's officers. Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio
Banderas), formerly one half of the infamous Murrieta brothers, is now
miserable and poor as he drinks his problems away. De La Vega stumbles
upon Alejandro when he spots a medallion he once gave to him as a young
boy for helping him in battle. Murrieta, at the time, is plotting to
kill the incomparable and cold-hearted Captain Love (Matt Letscher), who
is responsible for his brother's death. De La Vega teaches him to
control his anger, and enlists his help so that he can finally take
revenge.
And so begins the training of the new Zorro. Banderas is truly wonderful
and dashing in this role, with his inexperienced quips and humorous jabs
about getting into battle. Hopkins, on the other hand, is such a veteran
presence and distinguished actor that we will go along with whatever he
says. Together, they meld exceptionally well as the mentor and his
apprentice. This is the life-force that makes The Mask of Zorro so
enjoyable.
There's also sprinkles of romance between Banderas and the gorgeous
Zeta-Jones, played out in humorous sword-play and marvelous chemistry.
The dialogue throughout the film is crisp and well spoken, separating
the good from the bad with an easily distinguishable black line. The
human elements are fun, but the real scene-stealing belongs to the
incredible fight choreography. Characters clash their swords at
lightning speed, and Banderas flips and tumbles like an amazingly
talented daredevil acrobat. The stunts in The Mask of Zorro are all
spectacular, and the action will give you white knuckles almost
instantly.
There's a few instances of violence that could have been toned down, but
even so this should entertain the whole family. There's enough
well-played humor, rousing action and delightful romance to meet nearly
anyone's approval. The fact that Zorro has no super powers is what makes
him so unique. He fights for something that everyone can get behind,
wants what is best for his people, and has good taste in women... this
is what I call a real hero.
 Contact Jamey at:  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   When I taught high-school history I was determined that my
classes would not be among the 99.44% of teens who
acquired a deep hatred of humankind's record at worst, an
indifference to the subject at best.  So the books I assigned to
them for outside reading were always historical fiction.  No
matter that the genre can sometimes play fast and loose with
the facts.  The important thing was that these kids--who were
never going to become historians or scholars in that field--
acquire both a liking for the discipline and a feel for the spirit
of the times.  "Johnny Tremain" would do to give them a
feeling for the color of the American Revolution and "All Quiet
on the Western Front" for the horrors of World War I.  We'd
acquire the basic facts quickly in class and, in fact, would
have fun figuring out where the fictitious works deviated from
the truth.
   Some stories play so fast with truth that we'd have a difficult
time justifying their use with our chairmen and principals.  The
great swashbuckler "The Mask of Zorro," based on the
character created by police reporter Johnston McCulley, is a
good example.  The bad news is that the adventures of this
California Robin Hood might confuse the heck out of the
readers--what was the former governor of Spain doing still
tossing his weight around in California after the Spaniards
were kicked out of the province in 1821?  The good news is
that the story of Zorro would furnish a kaleidoscopic, dare one
say psychedelic, imagery about life in what became America's
most bountiful state during its transition from Spanish rule to
Mexico's dominion, while under the dictatorship of General
Santa Anna--who later lost his leg and a huge piece of
territory to the Stars and Stripes in America's most territorially
enriching war.
   Perhaps the biggest fib conveyed in director Martin
Campbell's lush new TriStar movie "The Mask of Zorro"
occurs when the older Zorro, Don Diego De La Vega
(Anthony Hopkins) acts as mentor to Zorro the younger,
Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas).  Having taught the
former thief the art of swordplay, he declares, "I will teach you
charm," to which Murrieta replies, "What's that?"  The trouble
is that Banderas cannot help oozing charm even when
unkempt in a scruffy beard, dragged along the dirt by a team
of horses into captivity.  This sexiest of male performers on
the screen today has already stunned the skeptics with his
singing ability in "Evita" and has wowed the crowds in witty
movies like Pedro Almodovar's "Tie Me Up! Tie Me Down!"
and in the no-budget comic western that solidifed his talent
with an American audience in "Desperado."  Now, in the role
of young Zorro previously mythologized by Douglas Fairbanks
Sr. in 1920, by Tyrone Power in 1940, and in a less-than-
thrilling achievement by Frank Langella in 1974, he provides
his rapt audience with laughs and love and adventure that
keep the two-and-one-quarter hour picture throbbing.
   "The Mask of Zorro" opens the way all movies should:
without credits, saving the roll of acknowledgments to its
proper place at the end.  It substitutes the character's logo
astride a buckling horse against the light of a full moon.  The
older Zorro (the word means "fox" in Spanish, which is why
two unrelated men can adopt the commission) is captured by
Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), who has taken away the
man's wife Esperanza and his daughter, Elena (Catherine
Zeta-Jones) while imprisoning him for two decades.  Zorro
had fired up the Mexican crowds against the greedy governor,
who wants his arch enemy to be humiliated rather than killed. 
Ultimately springing himself from the dungeon, he meets
Alejandro Murieta and mentors him from a common thief and
clown into a swordsman who can perform acrobatic miracles
and who equals Eliza Doolittle in his ability to infiltrate and
impersonate a person of noble birth.
   Comedy, wit, and swordplay intermingle freely in this boldly
conceived adventure, as Zorro the elder teaches his charge
that "a noble is but a man who says one thing and thinks
another" and, when asking the still undisciplined student
whether he knows how to use a sword, receives the
response, "Sure: the pointed end goes into the other man."
   What makes "The Mask of Zorro" so different from the
usual blend of action-adventure movies today is its ability to
capture the concentration of an audience with only a token
amount of killing.  This is no small accomplishment
considering that today's moviegoers are brought up on
pictures with huge body counts.  How does it do this? 
Director Campbell relies on our love for seeing people
humiliated, and this is just what the two Zorros have in mind:
to make fools of people who have exploited armies of the
unwashed.  While carving a "Z" into the neck of the governor
is among the more violent acts, Campbell tickles our
funnybones by humbling young Zorro and the bad guys alike
with more pratfalls than Chevy Chase can accomplish in an
hour.  In short, the pointed end of the sword rarely goes into
the other man.
   The swordfights--and there are many--are accompanied by
James Horner's palpitating score which treats the battles s
though they were a Spanish-American version of flamenco, all
building to a climax extragantly photographed by Phil Meheux
over a gold mine which is about to be blown up together with
scores of Mexican laborers by the evil governor. 
   For the love interest, Banderas meets his match in
Catherine Zeta-Jones who, as the daughter of the older Zorro,
Elena, matches the daring Robin Hood equally on the dance
floor and the saber-rattling grounds.  Not a single curse flies
in this PG-13 film, nor is there a conventional, hot sex scene. 
What does that mean?  We don't need such gratuities if a
movie has star power, some flat-out hilarious comedy, and
lavishly-budgeted crowd scenes photographed with passion
and good fun.  "The Mask of Zorro" is a hoot.

Author
Jerry Saravia
It is rare to see an action-adventure film that evokes memories of the action
serials of yesteryear - remember The Masked Avenger or Buck Rogers? A
commonplace argument is that recent action films focus more on Dolby-ized
explosions and car crashes than any story or plot. "The Mask of Zorro" is that
rarity - a fast-paced, rollicking action film that brings back the snap and
vigor of Zorro in all its glory, without resorting to extreme violence or heavy
explosions, and it has a reasonably decent story to tell.
During the opening sequence, we learn that Zorro, otherwise known as Don Diego
de la Vega (played with panache by Anthony Hopkins) is the masked hero of the
Mexican people. Some prisoners are about to be executed by a firing squad led by
Governor Don Rafaelo Montero (Stuart Wilson), and the crowd bawls. Before you
know it, Zorro comes out of thin air and rescues the prisoners with sword, whip,
a trusty steed, and attitude. Unfortunately, he is apprehended by Montero's
guards resulting in the death of his wife. 
Twenty years later, Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas) is a wandering street
thief who inexplicably becomes Zorro's star pupil - I say inexplicably because
who would want to tutor a curly long-haired wanderer on the street, but never
mind. Zorro teaches Murieta everything about swords, chivalry, matters of
etiquette, conversation, and well-groomed appearances. Thus, Murieta becomes the
new, dashing Zorro slicing his way through several of Montero's minions, and
dancing elegantly with Montero's daughter, Elena (British-born Catherine
Zeta-Jones), who is really Vega's daughter. 
"The Mask of Zorro" has plenty of stunts and action scenes, but its main thrust
is an expanded backstory about Vega's past and the revenge he seeks on his
wife's death. This exposition with the well-cast Hopkins shows more flair and
promise than I might have anticipated, even for a hokey Hollywood production
like this one. 
As for Banderas and Zeta-Jones, they do have sparkling chemistry, culminating in
a romantic kiss during a sword duel. The biggest weakness is Stuart Wilson
(previously a villain in "Lethal Weapon 3") as the fatuous Montero who isn't
remotely threatening or evil. Still, "The Mask of Zorro" is as escapist and fun
as Hollywood has been getting lately.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Author
Chad Polenz
1998, PG-13, 136 minutes [2 hours, 16 minutes]
Starring: Antonio Banderas (Alejandro Murrieta/Zorro), Anthony Hopkins (Don
Diego de la Vega/Zorro) Catherine Zeta-Jones (Elena), Stuart Wilson (Don
Rafael Montero); written by Ted Elliott, John Eskow, Randall Jahnson, Terry
Rossio; produced by Doug Claybourne, David Foster; directed by Martin
Campbell.
Seen August 9, 1998 at 9:15 p.m. at Rotterdam Square Cinemas (Rotterdam, NY),
theater #3, by myself for free using my Sony/Loews critic's pass. [Theater
rating: ***: good picture, sound, and seats]
If there was any doubt that all Hollywood summer movies are lacking
originality, consider this: "The Mask Of Zorro," which takes place in the
mid-1800s, has an action scene once every 10 or 15 minutes, has a scene in
which a woman is stripped to her underwear while sword fighting, and ends with
an explosion so huge it rivals something from the "Terminator" films. Were
these events really typical of the time?
The film opens with a disclaimer quickly explaining the background of the
story. The villain, Don Rafael Montero (Wilson), is briefly described as being
some kind of corrupt leader from Spain governing the colonies of what is now
California. I may be wrong on this account, but the film's opening scene makes
the "logical" explanation to the story's background seem silly because when we
see Montero about to have three innocent men executed just to draw out Zorro,
that tells us all we really need to know.
Of course Zorro appears and a terrific scene of action and drama ensues and
it's actually exciting and suspenseful at the time. We're not concerned with
the story behind the action, as long as there is action. Montero is a classic
bad guy with his precisely-groomed mustache, slicked hair, fancy clothes,
crooked smirk, and of course a wicked laugh. Wilson fills the role nicely,
making Montero an easy-to-hate villain, so much so it's hard to tell if he's
over-acting or if the script is really so trite.
And yet the film's opening works due to its simplicity and over-the-top
action. The initial atmosphere is lighthearted enough to take the zaniness of
it all in stride, so when Zorro single-handedly defeats 20 armed men, we don't
notice how cartoony the violence is, or how the fighting is so obviously
choreographed, or why the guards in the tower wait until two kids drop a
statue on them before they start firing their rifles.
It's unfortunate the film could not have had such a breezy spirit during its
"serious" aspects. We learn the true identity of Zorro is Don Diego de la Vega
(Hopkins), who appears to be a man of some importance, which is why Montero
claims to have always loved de la Vega's wife (why don't heroes ever marry
ugly women to keep the villain from trying to steal them?). Tragedy instantly
strikes our hero and thus the film flash-forwards to 20 years later to provide
just the right subplots, themes, and new conflicts and characters to give
Zorro a reason to resurface.
The real reason for a new Zorro is the film's star, Antonio Banderas.
Banderas is a good actor and he certainly seems to be having fun here as
Alejandro Murrieta, one half of an infamous pair of sibling criminals. He is
approached by de la Vega to wear the mask of Zorro and once again fight
against the corrupt Montero who is using slave labor at a secret gold mine as
part of an elaborate conspiracy to buy California.
It is from here on that the story becomes little more than a series of scenes
stitched together to provide for action, undercover work, and a romantic
subplot between Alejandro and Montero's "daughter" Elena (Zeta-Jones). Minor
elements such as Alenjandro's attempt to steal a horse turn into elaborate
fight and chase scenes. In the spirit of "Indiana Jones" the action is mixed
with comedy and slapstick, which is appealing because of the cartoony nature
of it all. But the more dramatic scenes which further the plot are presented
as if they were Shakespeare (especially anything involving Montero's evil
schemes). 
Zorro is one of the most underrated and least utilized characters of 20th
century fiction. Although he isn't unlike Batman in his quest to fight for the
people, he doesn't have many gadgets and must rely on his own skills to solve
mysteries and win battles. Although these aspects of the character is played
up well, it's just about the only aspect the film focuses on. No background on
the character is given such as where he originated from, whether he is one man
or part of a secret society, where the original Zorro learned his skills, and
most importantly, why he risks his life to do the things he does. de la Vega
claims Zorro is a servant of the people, but not once do either men seem to
care for anyone other than themselves and their love for Elena.
Throughout "The Mask Of Zorro" I kept picturing the screenwriters arguing
over plots, scenes, and lines of dialogue. Perhaps they wrote in shifts
without regard to continuity, as there would be many good scenes in a row, and
then everything would go sour quickly. But in the end it is really the
Hollywood machine at blame for trying to fix something that wasn't broken.

Author
Steve Kong
Zorro is the first true action hero of this summer, and maybe of the last
few summers. And for the price of admission you get not one Zorro, but two!
A detailed explanation of the underlying plot for The Mask of Zorro is an
exercise in futility. It deals with Don Montero (Staurt Wilson) trying to
buy California. The story that drives the movie is that of the relationship
between the elder Zorro (Anthony Hopkins) and the new Zorro (Antonio
Banderas).
Each Zorro has his own problems to solve. The elder Zorro wants revenge on
Montero for killing his wife, stealing, and raising his daughter. Young
Zorro seeks revenge against a corrupt US Calvary man, Captain Love (Matthew
Letscher), for killing his brother. Young Zorro is also romantically
attracted to Elder Zorro's daughter. The daughter of Elder Zorro, Elena
(Catherine Zeta Jones) was stolen and raised by Don Montero. She slowly
finds small clues to who she is.
Though there are some gun fights in The Mask of Zorro, the largest chunk of
action uses swords and not guns. This makes for some exciting swashbuckling
fun, unlike many of the films currently playing onscreen. I was happy to
see a movie that does not rely on gunfights to generate excitement. Kudos
to director Martin Campbell for keeping the sword fights exciting and fresh
instead of going the gun battle route.
Talking about Campbell, he seems to be the guy that can revive anything. He
has a knack for making so-old-it's-cool type films. Campbell's last film
was GoldenEye, which single-handedly revived the James Bond franchise. Now,
it looks like he has also revitalized the Zorro franchise.
As kids, my sister and I watched re-runs of the black and white Zorro
episodes on TV, so I was quite delighted to see that there was going to be
a big screen version of Zorro. I stepped into the theatre expected a lot
and was not disappointed when I left.
What can you say about Anthony Hopkins? To begin with, he is one of the
best actors around. And with Zorro, he shows that not only can he act, he
can handle swordplay with no problems. Hopkins is wonderful in The Mask of
Zorro.
Antonio Banderas has not had a real big-screen hit, but I believe The Mask
of Zorro will be his first. Banderas lights up the screen with his casual
charm. He is the perfect Zorro. What I loved about Bandera's Zorro was that
the character was suave, but also had some flaws. Look for the scene in
which he is surround by an army of men after trying to steal a horse. Also
look ashe tries to jump onto his horse like the elder Zorro.
The one to watch for is Zeta Jones, though. A relative newcomer to the
bigscreen, Zeta Jones lights up the screen. She has a zest that is
indescribable. The chemistry between her and Banderas is some of the best
I've seen lately. I love the scene in which she catches Banderas's Zorro
trying to steal a horse.
The script by Terry Rossio, Ted Elliott, and John Eskow has enough action
to keep our attention. The dialogue is snappy and funny. The script is
somewhat convoluted and hard to understand, but this really doesn't matter
because of Campbell's excellent direction. The film runs a bit long and
there are things that feel out of place. For instance, the Montero's gold
mine looks so fake that it feels as if it belongs in some Las Vegas hotel.
The score by James Horner is well done, especially taking into account that
his last score for Deep Impact was as generic as it could be. The score for
The Mask of Zorro is quite listenable.
Overall, The Mask of Zorro is an exciting film and a good escapist movie.
It is a fun film and I highly recommend it for everyone who is sick of all
the gunfights in motion pictures lately. The swashbuckling sword fights are
worth admission itself, but the movie producers decide to give us more and
give us two Zorros for the price of one.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
The title begs the question:  Why the mask of Zorro?  "Zorro" would have
been a perfectly good title, save that this movie has actually two
Zorros -- Anthony Hopkins as the legendary bandit and Antonio Banderas
as his young protege.  "The Sword of Zorro" would have been all right as
a title -- there is enough swordplay to delight the heart of the most
avid Errol Flynn fan.  "The Horse of Zorro" would have been a cool
title, too -- Zorro's black stallion Tornado is a source of occasional
slapstick.  For those more interested in the physique of Banderas, you
could have "The Pants of Zorro" -- or, contrariwise, "The Plunging
Neckline of Catherine Zeta-Jones" -- both of which get ample screen
time.
But, no, it's the mask that's most important.  The mask allows Zorro to
do the dashing and dangerous things that he does, while still allowing
him access to the society of Old California.  But like everything else,
in life, the mask isn't so simple.  All the main characters in The Mask
of Zorro wear masks of one sort or another -- save the lovely Ms.
Zeta-Jones, for whom a mask would only hide her sensuous beauty.  It's
the masks that give The Mask of Zorro a little bit of psychologial
resonance and lift it above its origins as a costume swashbuckler.
Hopkins appears first as Zorro, mask and all.  To its credit, The Mask
of Zorro figures that we already know who Zorro is -- there's no
explication of his origin, how he came to wear the mask, or any of that
stuff.  There's just a great action sequence (it would be the climax of
a lesser movie) which sets up the legend and the relationship between
Zorro and chief baddie Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson).  However, no
mask is perfect.  Hopkins is unmasked, his wife is killed, and his
daughter kidnapped by Montero.
The action restarts 20 years later, as Montero returns to California
with Zorro's daughter (the aforementioned luscious Zeta-Jones) at his
side.  Wilson has to wear a mask, too -- he has adopted Zeta-Jones as
his daughter, and must hide his dark, scheming heart behind a veneer of
courtliness and gentility.  Wilson is much better than this than, say,
Alan Rickman in Kevin Costner's Robin Hood movie.  It's a quality
performance in a quality movie.
The titular mask, though, belongs to Banderas, and he wears it nobly.
We first see Banderas as an unlettered Mexican bandito, picked by
Hopkins to be his instrument of revenge.  We see a training sequence
where Banderas learns to fence and tumble, and there's a gloriously
goofy comic sequence where he tries to steal a horse and fails
miserably.  But the bandit's mask isn't all Banderas has to wear.  He
has to impersonate a Spanish don so that he may get intelligence from
Don Rafael -- and not incidentally, dance a passionate tango with the
beauteous Zeta-Jones.  (We are spared a lot of the Eliza Doolittle
business that must have gone on between the elder and younger Zorros --
who wanted to see Hopkins dancing with Banderas, anyway?)
While all this is going on, Hopkins has to wear yet another mask -- as
the humble servant to Banderas's ersatz don, which leads to a couple of
very touching scenes.  All of the masks everyone wears gives the movie a
strong psychological dimension that would be lacking if this was a
straight action movie.  Not that the action isn't great -- it's just
fine, with some great swashbucling scenes -- but the real action is of
the mind and the heart.  The Mask of Zorro succeeds because it's driven
by good performances and a good story.  It's clearly a sword slash above
this summer's mindless action films.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE MASK OF ZORRO
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Antonio Banderas, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matt Letscher.
Screenplay:  John Eskow and Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio.
Producers:  David Foster and Doug Claybourne.
Director:  Martin Campbell.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  137 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are a few noteworthy similarities between Zorro and James Bond,
the last iconic hero directed by Martin Campbell (in GOLDENEYE).  Like
Bond, Zorro has a decades-long screen history; like Bond, Zorro has
been portrayed by some hard-to-follow screen legends (including Tyrone
Power and Douglas Fairbanks, Sr.); like those portraying Bond, those
portraying Zorro have almost never been of the same national origin as the
character.  Most significantly, in both cases the character himself is
larger than life -- all you need to do is put him on screen and you're
halfway to satisfying the audience.  
     It's a frustrating waste of effort to watch a character like that
dwarfed by a typically over-blown contemporary action film structure.
Antonio Banderas dons THE MASK OF ZORRO (eventually) with more than enough
charisma to create a rousing heroic adventure.  What a shame no one had
enough confidence in the actor, or the character.  Banderas plays  
Alejandro Murrieta, a thief who once with his brother assisted original
Zorro Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins) in his mission to protect the
poor citizens of 19th century Spanish-ruled California.  Twenty years
after that incident, Alejandro is anxious to avenge the death of his
brother at the hands of the cruel Captain Love (Matt Letscher), de la Vega
has finally escaped from prison, and de la Vega's old nemesis Don Rafael
Montero (Stuart Wilson) has returned to old California with a plan to
regain power.  To further his own plans of vengeance, de la Vega seizes
on Alejandro's, training a successor to wear the fear-inspiring black
costume and make the sign of the Z.
     The two make a decent enough pair -- Alejandro the impulsive pupil
and de la Vega his graying Yoda -- but THE MASK OF ZORRO only truly 
comes to life when Banderas is front and center, clad in black.  He brings
a roguish swagger to the part of a common man delighting at being turned
into a super-hero; when he over-hears the confession of Montero's adopted
daughter Elena (Catherine Zeta-Jones) that she finds the masked man
attractive, you suspect it's all he can do to keep from giving himself a
huge pat on the back.  In the few set pieces where Banderas gets to whirl
into action, whether crossing swords as Zorro or burning up the dance
floor with Elena while posing as a nobleman, he's an electrifying
presence, a genuine movie star giving the audience a grand show.
     In this bloated production, however, it's hard to keep focused on the
dash and flash of Zorro.  The length is padded by the obligatory back
story introducing us to the "origin" of the new Zorro, as well as a
ridiculous sword fight between Zorro and Elena which offers stilted banter
and a PG-13-preserving disrobing thanks to strategically placed hair.
Mostly, the story by Ted Elliott and Terry Rossio (the summer's busiest
writing team, with credits on GODZILLA and SMALL SOLDIERS as well) has the
generic feel of an action film just one re-write removed from being a Bond
vehicle.  The evil Don Rafael stands before a map to lay out his power-mad
scheme, his ice-hearted right-hand-man Captain Love acts as Oddjob-like
muscle, and the action scenes are strung together with only cursory
concern for narrative flow.  The setting has a back-lot blandness to it
without the back-lot charm of swashbuckling melodrama.   1840s California
might just as well have been 1960s East Germany or 1990s Iraq.
     You may be pleading for something as restrained as the finale of a 
typical Bond adventure by the time THE MASK OF ZORRO reaches its climactic
showdown at a gold mine.  The split story structure once again forces the
focus away from Banderas, as Campbell cuts back and forth between 
Alejandro's duel-to-the-death with Captain Love and de la Vega's
duel-to-the-death with Don Rafael, occasionally interrupted by the
panicked screams of slave laborers carted in from outtakes of INDIANA
JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM.  The whole thing culminates, naturally, in
an endless 50-powder-kegs-and-a-cloud of dust explosion where the zeal of
the pyrotechnicians is topped only by the sound effects guys' goofy
decision to make it sound like they just blew up a pack of dyspeptic
mountain lions.  So much for an adventure which primes you to cheer for a
great hero.  Banderas' appeal alone may be just enough to win over some
viewers; the waste of that appeal, and of the Man in Black's commanding
image, made me long for some heroic figure to come along and make a few
strategic slashes in the editing room.

Author
Chris Bumbray
For over a year now the trailers have been playing in theaters, and before
every video released by the film's distributor Sony. I personally have been
dying to see this movie from the moment it was announced. This is probably
one of the best movies I have ever seen, and easily the best of the summer.
                                                            The film begins
with a bond style opening, that has Zorro walking to the middle of the
screen and and slashing a Z. After this we have a 20 minute prologue
featuring Anthony Hopkins as Zorro. Hopkins is surprisingly great as Zorro.
I must say this now, I think Hopkins is one of the greatest actors in modern
cinema. The best part of the prologue is the duel between Zorro (as Don
Diego de la Vega) and the film's villain Stuart Wilson. This backed by James
Horner's excellent score make this extraordinary.  Vega's wife is killed and
his baby taken by Wilson, and Vega himself is imprisoned. Flash forward
twenty years to Vega's escape and subsequent training of the new Zorro
played by Antonio Bandares. Antonio's character seeks revenge for the murder
of his brother at the hand of one of the villain's guards.

Author
R. L. Strong
TriStar Pictures in association with Zorro Productions and Amblin Entertainment
Antonio Banderas  Anthony Hopkins  "THE MASK OF ZORRO"
Catherine Zeta Jones   Stuart Wilson    Matthew Letscher
Co-Producer: John Gertz   Cinematography by Phil Meheux   Edited by Thom Noble
Music by James Horner   Production Designer: Cecilia Montiel
Costume Designer: Graciela Mazsn   Associate Producer: Tava R. Maloy
Executive Producers: Steven Spielberg, Walter F. Parkes, Laurie MacDonald
Produced by Doug Claybourne & David Foster    Original Story by Ted Elliott, Terry Rossio &
Randall Jahnson  Screenplay by: John Eskow, Ted Elliott  & Terry Rossio
Directed by Martin Campbell
136 minutes  Rated PG-13
Since 1920 with the release of Douglas Fairbank's classic adventure,
the character of Zorro has been one of the most portrayed characters
in film history. Most people are only familiar with the famed Mexican
hero through the Walt Disney series of 1957 which stared future 'Lost
in Space" dad.. Guy Williams. The character of Zorro has been
portrayed by a wide range of actors and all of them have been
serviceable at the least (with the exception of George Hamilton in the
disappointing 'Zorro, the Gay Blade'). Antonio Banderas is the latest
actor to don the black mask and cape, and the results are enthralling.
The story begins with Zorro rescuing a group of peasants from public
execution. Now this entire is simply a trap set to capture Zorro. But
Zorro is saved, himself by the intervention of two young
brothers. Zorro thanks the boys by giving the oldest a
medallion. Zorro returns home and his true identity of Don Diego de la
Vega. Greeting his wife, he goes to his newborn daughter, Elena and
continues to tell her the legend of the famed Zorro. It is then that
the corrupt Don Rafael Montero invades Don Diego's home.  Now knowing
the true identity of his enemy, Don Rafael fights with Don Diego and
in the course of battle, Esperenza de la Vega (Don Diego's wife) is
killed. Don Diego is arrested and taken to prison. Don Rafael, who was
also in love Esperenza de la Vega takes the child and vows to raise
the girl as his own daughter.
20 years pass. And Mexico has been under oppressive Spanish
rule. Three bandits are ambushed by the local police, Alejandro
Murrieta (Banderas), Joaquin Murrieta (Victor Rivers) and American
expatriate Three Fingered Jack (L.Q. Jones). Joaquin is murdered by
American Captain Harrison Love (Matthew Letscher) during an escape
attempt. Alejandro returns to accept his fate, but not before
retrieving the medallion Joaquin has around his neck, the gift from
Zorro.
Montero returns from Spain with his daughter (?), Elena. Don Diego has
escaped from prison and only stops murdering Montero upon seeing his
now grown child. Alejandro has also managed to escape his captors, and
the two men form a bond. After some deliberation Don Diego accepts
Alejandro as his pupil and tells him the truth about the legend of
Zorro.  After much arduous training, Alejandro takes the cape and the
mask and a new Zorro returns to save the people of Mexico.
Directed with a marvelous eye for style and simplicity, Martin
Campbell ('Goldeneye') pays glorious tribute to the memories of
Michael Curtiz and Douglas Fairbanks. There is nothing in this film
that stands out over itself, drawing attention away from the story and
it's characters. For once we can no longer, honestly say, "They don't
make movies like that anymore", because with this film, they do.. and
they do it triumphantly. The film takes it's time setting up it's plot
of stolen riches, familial debts and blood oaths. Mr. Campbell
deserves full credit for delivering a masterfully composed
film. Scribes John Eskow, Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio have fashioned a
grand tribute to the classic films of the thirties and forties. With
rich and strong character development and expert plotting, 'The Mask
of Zorro' should be a reminder to everyone that a film does not need
millions of dollars of special effects and pyrotechnics to enthrall
them. Good story telling remains, good story telling.
The performances in the film are exemplary. Anthony Hopkins is heroic
as Don Diego do la Vega. Here is a man who is true to his family and
his country and is willing to risk his life for both. His passion for
revenge becomes tempered by the moral conflict of his daughter Elena
(Catherine Zeta-Jones) not knowing him as family. The heartbreak in
Hopkins' eyes as he confronts his Daughter with the truth, is
honest. Mr. Hopkins deserves the title (unashamedly) of greatest
living actor today. Antonio Banderas shows a growing charm and ability
that was only hinted at in "Desperado". His fine turn turn as the
reborn Zorro is so enlivening and glorious that you'll only envision
him as Zorro from now on, the same way as only Christopher Reeve is
Superman and Michael Keaton is Batman. Banderas owns this character.
The real discovery in the film is Catherine Zeta-Jones, previously
only noted for her turn as a paid assassin in the disappointing "The
Phantom". Ms. Jones turns in a marvelously mischievous and seductive
performance as Elena. Her charm and poise throughout the film is
refreshing and gives the entire picture a fresh jolt every time she is
on screen.
Everything about "The Mask of Zorro" cries out in it's goal of pure
entertainment. There is nothing dumbed down for the audience. This is
the truest adventure we've seen since "Raiders of the Lost Ark". Kudos
to all involved. No faint praise in saying that this film will (and
should) become a classic piece of filmaking.
Copyright 1998 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be reprinted or duplicated, either in part or
in whole without the express written permission of the author.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: July 17, 1998
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones,
Stuart Wilson, Matthew Letscher
Directed by: Martin Campbell
Distributed by: Sony Pictures Entertainment / TriStar Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (intense action and violence)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/mask.htm 
For the first time in a long time, both the experienced cinema-goer and
the novice movie-watcher get to experience top-notch derring-do and
flamboyance without having to travel to an obscure film festival. With a
zest normally reserved for independent or little-known features, THE
MASK OF ZORRO combines excellent acting and theatrics with guns-blazing
action with sensual romanticism with an interesting story for a
smorgasboard of demographic targets. Everything about ZORRO is handled
thoughtfully, carefully, and intelligently for a motion picture that
definitely comes in at above par. 
Directed by Martin Campbell, whose last feature saw the return of James
Bond in GOLDENEYE, the movie is set in early 19th century Mexico tells
the story of the legendary folk hero, Zorro. The masked man is to
Mexicans then what Batman is to prepubescent comic readers today - a man
who works against crime and injustice anonymously. Similar to Batman,
Zorro's true identity is that of an aristocrat, Don Diego de la Vega
(Anthony Hopkins). And so it begins, as Zorro strides onto the screen a
la James Bond, etches his Z into space, and the audience is ready. The
story, then: Diego wearies of his extensive tenure as Zorro and, after
losing his wife and daughter to a cruel tyrant (Stuart Wilson), he
retires into hiding. Many years later, he comes across a young man named
Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas) who is seeking to avenge his
brother's death. 
The opening scenes, which develop the characters and motives of Don
Diego and Alejandro, are well done in every respect. The audiences grow
to know and like the characters. Both are well-cast, Banderas for his
sex appeal and Hopkins for his wizened countenance; these appointments
continue to show their worth as Banderas and Hopkins play off of each
other for the movie's comic relief. As the story continues, it turns out
that the man who murdered Alejandro's brother, Captain Harrison Love
(Matthew Letscher) now works for Don Diego's villain, Don Rafael
Montero. Don Diego takes Alejandro under his wing and trains him to be
his successor as the masked hero of Mexico. Unfortunately for both men,
the wrench in their plans is the reappearance of Don Diego's daughter,
Elena (Catherine Zeta Jones) who had been raised as Montero's own during
the intervening years. 
Jones plays Elena with noticeable strength and energy, and the result of
this is a romance that sizzles veritably between Elena and Alejandro.
Although the relationship between Elena and her mostly-unknown father
Don Diego is not hit upon until late in the movie, it nevertheless
provides a believable motive for Diego's character to take the actions
that he does. The only plot hole that the John Eskow, Ted Elliot, and
Terry Rossio script encounters, in fact, is the post-Cold War-esque
invention of a motive for Don Rafael. Although the Zorro's primary goal
was to defend the wronged in the Mexican Revolution, the lack of such an
event means that the same villain must inspire a new revolution, this
time with the succession of California from the United States. But for
all of the fun and games that follows, it's definitely worth looking
past; it's also worth paying full price to see the pic.
FINAL AWARD FOR "THE MASK OF ZORRO": 3.5 stars - a great movie.

Author
Mark O'Hara
Zorro and I have a history.  Whenever I could find Guy Williams in the 
Disney series, his big shoulders swinging the sword to make the fat 
sergeant's pants fall, I watched with fascination.  Here was a show that 
had fun following a formula, that advertised its lack of seriousness.  
The show hooked me on action and adventure, clearing the way for my 
Friday-night addiction to THE WILD, WILD WEST.  As long as I didn't sit 
too close to the set, my parents let me watch as much as I wanted.
THE MASK OF ZORRO wants the audience to enjoy itself, and succeeds in 
most of its purpose.  The film is longish for a story that smacks of 
movie serials;  but enough swordplay, pursuit and explosions pack the 
minutes that the viewing experience is certainly never boring - and only 
slightly repetitive.
As Don Diego de la Vega, Anthony Hopkins wins our regard effortlessly.  
He plays a Zorro who, only a few minutes into the film, communicates the 
essential traits of the character.  Saber blazing, he defeats countless 
Spanish soldiers, rescues peasants whose execution was the bait that 
drew him, and finally, confronts the despicable governor Rafael Montero 
(Stuart Wilson).  Although Zorro escapes to show his familial tenderness 
at home, telling stories to baby Elena and kissing wife Esperanza 
(Julietta Rosen), the gentleman soon loses all that matters to him.  He 
is thrown into a terrible California prison just as Montero returns to 
Spain, accompanied by Don Diego's stolen infant.
The other plot involving injustice and greed centers on a couple of 
Mexican outlaws, the Murieta brothers, and a red-bearded mercenary named 
Captain Harrison Love (Matt Letscher).  The action has jumped 20 years, 
and fate has thrown together Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas) and 
Don Diego, who has escaped from his dungeon in a manner dreamed up even 
before Alexander Dumas.  It is the classic mentor-apprentice 
relationship:  one of the producers has even described it as Merlin 
teaching Arthur.  Credit goes to the director, Martin Campbell, for not 
spending too much time on the scenes in which the at-first inept 
Alejandro learns the craft from the elder Zorro and then assumes the 
mask himself.
Banderas is the most convincing Zorro yet.  His looks and accent only 
assist his comic timing and physical coordination.  (I confess it was 
hard to tell which was Banderas and which was the stuntman, especially 
in scenes showing Zorro masked.  But Banderas does a good deal of the 
fencing and fighting himself.)  Veteran combatant coach Bob Anderson did 
a masterful job with the male leads, as well as with Catherine 
Zeta-Jones (the adult Elena).  I can envision Banderas returning every 
few years for more slice-'em-up action - another old product remade into 
a franchise.
Technical aspects of THE MASK OF ZORRO are mostly smooth and 
transparent.  The sets are remarkable for their size and accuracy.  Many 
of the colors are probably too brilliant for nineteenth-century textiles 
and paint, but the buildings - and especially the scaffolding of a gold 
mine worked by enslaved peasants and political prisoners - contribute 
much to the storytelling.  The editing also pushes the story ahead 
rapidly.  In fact, very few scenes exist only to develop character.  I 
do not expect to see Elena brushing her hair or Zorro nursing his sore 
muscles;  but I would argue that the film is too tightly edited.  We see 
loads of action (and countless fights between our hero and the same 
baddies), with little connective tissue.  As I write this I remember, 
though, that Martin Campbell is known in part for his action films:  THE 
MASK OF ZORRO even copies the openings and closings of James Bond.  
Zorro swirls his cape and, turning to the audience, carves a burning 
"Z".  
In the end, the film's action has fashioned a tone that is almost 
tongue-in-cheek.  We know the formula;  we've known it since we were 
kids.  Some of the fights are so deliciously over-the-top that they set 
my son and me laughing out loud.  Unlike several recent disappointments, 
THE MASK OF ZORRO works hard but knows when to lighten up.


Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

I suppose the main benefit of staying up late to watch "The Mask of
Zorro" was the wonderful air conditioning you get in movie theaters.
It was something like 100 degrees out with humidity, but I was able to
wait it out before going home.  The main drawback of watching the movie
was the movie itself.  Thumbs down: not a diaster like "Godzilla" and
all the other movies I've forgotten this summer, but certainly nothing
to hoot about.
Basically, the movie goes like this: we see Zorro 1.0 in 1820 or
thereabouts, played by Anthony Hopkins with some black shoeshine on his
facial hair, doing the fancy sword play with hordes of Spanish soldiers
in ill-fitting uniforms.  It's his last ride, as the Spanish are being
kicked out of California and Mexico: his enemy is leaving.  Zorro 1.0
perhaps left a trail of breadcrumbs while making his getaway (it's
unclear), so he's unmasked, captured, infant daughter kidnapped by the
Bad Guy 1.0, wife killed.
Flash forward about twenty years.  A couple of kids who helped Zorro
1.0 have now grown up into Antonio Bandaras and Some Hairy Guy, his
brother.  During a botched robbery, Bad Guy 2.0, dressed as an American
calvary officer from the Civil War (some twenty years in the future;
his uniform is simply visionary in that regard) kills the Hairy Guy.
Antonio Bandaras gets away.  Meanwhile, a remarkably spry Zorro 1.0
escapes from prison and finds that Bad Guy 1.0 has returned, with his
daughter no less, fully grown and with ample cleavage.
Zorro 1.0 and Antonio Bandaras meet up accidentally, with Zorro 1.0
remembering the kids.  They go off to train Antonio Bandaras to be
Zorro 2.0.  At this point, the next half hour of the film looks a
little like those old martial arts movies, with the young, unruly
apprentice being taught by the wise old master.  Included are wacky
exercises, like pushups over a bunch of candles, as well as the deeply
philosophical monologues about circles and discipline.  Remarkably
quickly, Zorro 2.0's kung fu is strong enough to take his revenge on
Bad Guy 2.0: "you killed my brother, now I kill you".
Instead of this happening, we wander into a long, slow part in the
film, where Zorro 1.0 and Zorro 2.0 put on street clothes and go to a
party.  Hijinks!  Well, no, not much happens, though there's a tango
thing going on, too, between Zorro 2.0 and the daughter.  If they were
doing Zorro Meets Footloose, it might be a bit more interesting, but,
alas.  Oh, daughter is forward thinking in a late 20th C. way.
Interesting how movies must insist that our political beliefs had to
exist in Mexican California, Camelot, Reconstruction Alabama, Han
China, etc.  But I digress.
More things happen: swordfights, a very good horse-stunts sequence,
though nothing breathtaking (Jackie Chan does more on a motorcycle with
his left foot).  Yet more clevage, but they keep things PG-13.
Mistreated workers are rescued, "Leia, I am your father," Bad Guys 1.0
and 2.0 get their comeupance, various Zorros get their revenge,
reconciliation (with version numbers matching precisely), joy.  If they
didn't have cheesy computer generated sunsets (both near the beginning
and the end), it'd be a much better film.
Head scratching moments: why is Antony Hopkins, no, correction, Sir
Anthony Hopkins in this film?  I'm aware that Sir Lawrence Olivier
appeared in "Clash of the Titans" because he needed the money, but I
don't think Sir Anthony does.  He's also not Zeus, so there's no
satisfaction in hurling lightning bolts at unsuspecting golfers.
I have perhaps have watched too much Xena.  The sword fights there are
just more fun, perhaps less technically fluent, but just much more fun
than Zorro [12].0 taking on unathletic Mexican soldiers using a lot of
the same jump/flip/kick stuff.  Ai-ee-ee-ee-ee.

Author
Faust667@aol.com
It is rare to see an action-adventure film that evokes memories of the action serials of yesteryear - remember The Masked Avenger or Buck Rogers? A commonplace argument is that recent action films focus more on Dolby-ized explosions and car crashes than any story or plot. "The Mask of Zorro" is that rarity - a fast-paced, rollicking action film that brings back the snap and vigor of Zorro in all its glory, without resorting to extreme violence or heavy explosions, and it has a reasonably decent story to tell.
During the opening sequence, we learn that Zorro, otherwise known as Don Diego de la Vega (played with panache by Anthony Hopkins) is the masked hero of the Mexican people. Some prisoners are about to be executed by a firing squad led by Governor Don Rafaelo Montero (Stuart Wilson), and the crowd bawls. Before you know it, Zorro comes out of thin air and rescues the prisoners with sword, whip, a trusty steed, and attitude. Unfortunately, he is apprehended by Montero's guards resulting in the death of his wife. 
Twenty years later, Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas) is a wandering street thief who inexplicably becomes Zorro's star pupil - I say inexplicably because who would want to tutor a curly long-haired wanderer on the street, but never mind. Zorro teaches Murieta everything about swords, chivalry, matters of etiquette, conversation, and well-groomed appearances. Thus, Murieta becomes the new, dashing Zorro slicing his way through several of Montero's minions, and dancing elegantly with Montero's daughter, Elena (British-born Catherine Zeta-Jones), who is really Vega's daughter. 
"The Mask of Zorro" has plenty of stunts and action scenes, but its main thrust is an expanded backstory about Vega's past and the revenge he seeks on his wife's death. This exposition with the well-cast Hopkins shows more flair and promise than I might have anticipated, even for a hokey Hollywood production like this one. 
As for Banderas and Zeta-Jones, they do have sparkling chemistry, culminating in a romantic kiss during a sword duel. The biggest weakness is Stuart Wilson (previously a villain in "Lethal Weapon 3") as the fatuous Montero, who isn't remotely threatening or evil. Still, "The Mask of Zorro" is as escapist and fun as Hollywood has been getting lately.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com
THE NEGOTIATOR 

Author
Brian Koller
"The Mask of Zorro" is action-packed escapist fun,
perhaps a guilty pleasure for some, but it is
too shallow and ridiculous to be considered a good
movie.
"The Mask of Zorro" begins in California in the
year 1820, when it was still a Spanish possession.
Anthony Hopkins is Zorro, masked action hero by day,
aristocrat by night.  Governor and bad-guy Stuart
Wilson learns Hopkins' identify, and jails him,
for good measure killing his wife and kidnapping
his infant daughter.
Twenty years later, Hopkins escapes from prison,
and being too old for the role, instructs enthusiastic
bandit Antonio Banderas to take his place as
Zorro.  Banderas' brother has been killed by
Matthew Letscher, who is Wilson's right-hand man.
Meanwhile, Wilson has a plan of buying California
from Mexico, with gold extracted via slave labor from
a local mine.  Hopkins seeks revenge on Wilson, Banderas
seeks revenge on Letscher, and Banderas romances
Catherine Zeta Jones, who is Hopkins' now-adult
daughter.
What can be said that is positive about "Zorro"?
The sets are excellent, especially the mine.
The costumes are very good, and the endless action
scenes are well choreographed.  Zeta Jones is
beyond beautiful, and the cast is energetic.
So, why isn't "The Mask of Zorro" (not to be confused
with "The Mark of Zorro", the silent epic starring
Douglas Fairbanks Sr.) a good movie?  It's all action
and no thought.  The film is riddled with little problems.
I'll just describe a few of them.
Hopkins spends twenty years in prison.  The day Wilson
returns from Spain and pays a visit looking for Zorro
is the very day that Hopkins decides to escape.  Well,
if it was so easy, why didn't he break out twenty
years earlier?
Both Hopkins and Banderas can fight multiple swordsmen
at once.  They can also outrun bullets.  But when
the duel their enemies one-on-one, they can barely
hold their own.  Hopkins and Wilson have numerous
opportunities to kill each other, but don't.  It is
almost as if they prefer the other to stay alive,
so as to make their own life more interesting.
Hopkins trains Banderas to be not merely a great
swashbuckler and acrobat, but a gentleman as well.
He must be a great teacher, since Banderas learns
it all in just a few scenes.  It took Professor Higgins
an entire three-hour movie to train Eliza Doolittle.
Jones is a big fan of Zorro, and espouses pro-peasant
attitudes, despite being raised by despot Wilson.
It is amazing to me, but not to the writers, that
she never takes her father's side, and falls for
Zorro immediately.
Scenes typical of a Zorro movie, such as hapless soldiers
fumbling in an attempt to catch Zorro, Zorro swinging
from convenient ropes and chandeliers like Tarzan,
and jumping two stories onto a stationary horse
(Wouldn't that break the horse's back?  Wouldn't that
cause an, um, groin injury?) are present.  It is
probably impossible to make a great movie about Zorro,
(or Godzilla, or Batman, for that matter) unless it
is done as a parody, such as was done in "Zorro, the Gay
Blade" some years back.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
David N. Butterworth
        Douglas Fairbanks made his "mark" in 1920, as did Tyrone Power
twenty years later.  John Carroll "rode again" in 1959.  Now it's the turn
of Latin heartthrob Antonio Banderas to wear the mask of Zorro.  Whether
the titular reference be a sign, a ghost, a whip, or a son, the umpteen
big- and small-screen variants of the Zorro legend have, by now, milked the
living daylights out of the masked avenger who carves his name--or at least
his initial--with pride.
        While one might have expected a revisionist version of this classic
tale for today's audiences, the producers of "The Mask of Zorro" have
decided to play this go-round surprisingly straight.  Unfortunately, they
don't play it straight enough, choosing to pad the two-hours-plus running
time with awkward moments of slapstick, primarily on the part of Banderas,
which dilute the otherwise splashy, hot-blooded proceedings.
        It's almost as if a pre-release audience decided that this
interpretation wasn't funny enough.
        "Zorro, the Gay Blade," a 1981 spoof starring George Hamilton, was
more focused in its lampooning of the title character and a better choice
if you're looking for something camp.  But when Zorro reminds you more of
Inigo Montoya from "The Princess Bride" than he does Errol Flynn buckling
swashes, it's clear that the makers of "The Mask of Zorro"--let's blame
"GoldenEye" director Martin Campbell--have made a miscalculation somewhere.
        Still, when Banderas (or his horse) isn't acting cute, "The Mask of
Zorro" is eminently watchable, suffused with solid readings from Anthony
Hopkins as Don Diego de la Vega (the older, wiser Zorro), Catherine
Zeta-Jones (from British television's "The Darling Buds of May") as his
beautiful daughter Elena, and not one but two odious villains to hiss at.
        The film opens in old Spanish California, circa 1821.  The Baja
natives have found a champion in their midst, a mysterious masked man known
only as Zorro, who protects them from the money-grubbing land barons.
Mean, lean Spanish governor Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson) discovers
the identity of Zorro and in the struggle surrounding his apprehension,
kills de la Vega's wife and abducts his infant daughter, claiming her as
his own.
        Twenty years later when Montero returns with plans to make
California a republic, de la Vega escapes from prison and takes a common
thief, Alejandro Murrieta (Banderas) under his tutelage, grooming him as
the next Zorro.
        Zeta-Jones, in her first big production since the ill-conceived
"The Phantom," gives an uplifting performance as Elena, who finally
discovers the truth behind her origins.  Elena proves she can parry with
the best of them, which is why it's disappointing that her sword fight with
Zorro culminates with our black-clad hero stripping her of her dignity.
Hopkins is typically commanding as the retired caped crusader (who hangs
out in a cave like that other one), and Banderas is suave and dashing as
his protégé.  In fact, "The Mask of Zorro" fully exploits the good looks of
all three of its leads.
        Try to ignore the brief farcical lapses and you should find "The
Mask of Zorro" to be a flamboyant, rousing display of derring-do.

Author
Nick Amado
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones, Stuart Wilson, Matt Letscher
There are some moments in Zorro that make you feel like a kid
again. That is, if you recall ever liking Zorro. The duels, the
mysterious mask, the passion and the action all are present in Zorro's
latest reincarnation, The Mask Of Zorro. But these moments are
surrounded by nearly two and a half hours of really arduous
story-telling.
This story, starting in the early 1820's Mexico spans 20 years. The
first scene establishes that the Zorro of the time (Don Diego, played
by Hopkins) is a freedom fighter out for peace and justice. But when
his nemisis, the governer of Mexico, kills Zorro's wife and takes his
baby daughter for his very own, Zorro disappears. (Which is easy when
you're in prison.) After 20 years, he breaks out and takes on a lowly
but talented theif, Alejandro, played by Banderas, as a pupil. One of
the governer's captains killed Alejandro's brother. So now there are
two Zorro's who seek revenge.
There is a near-pointless side plot that involves the heavies
attempting to buy California with gold stolen from there. It provides
for a few James Bondian bad guy scenes (the head honcho standing
around a huge table addressing the other baddies, while standing in
front of a map, talking about world domination.) But really only makes
for a setting for the final showdown.
Zorro has as many highs as it does lows. First off, watching Antonio
Banderas is a delight. He is as funny as he is heroic and devilishly
handsome. He does some fantastic stunts with the sword, and still,
throughout his heroism, he manages to play the buffoon from time to
time.
Anthony Hopkins, sadly, phones in his performance. Though he too is
enraged at the evil-doings (and has more of a vendetta than Banderas'
character) his eyes never change. He never shows the passion that has
driven his character for 20 years. Aside from that, he is the only
Mexican (well, former Spaniard) that speaks with a British
accent. Which is a shame, too, since Hopkins is brilliant at masking
his voice.
And then there is Catherine Zeta Jones. This newcomer to American
cinema manages to steal every scene she is in. Partly because she is
one of the most strikingly beautiful women I've ever seen on the
silver screen. But there is a tenderness that she brings to her
character. She plays the love-interest for Alejandro, and is the only
person in the film that can out-do Banderas' fine performance in each
of their scenes together. The Welsh actress also hides her accent
quite well, adopting a Spanish one. (Strange, though, that she plays
Hopkin's daughter and yet...)
The action in Zorro doesn't disappoint, but it is sparce. The film is
so overlong that characters seem to pop up out of nowhere just to keep
it going. I kept asking myself, "now, why would she be there at this
time?" or "where the hell did he come from? And why is he here?" I was
never satisfied with the drive of the storytelling, the primary fault
of director Campbell. The cuts from scene to scene often left me with
a sour taste.
Aside from two of the lead performances, the big winner in Zorro is
the Art direction. The sets are out of this world, particularly
Zorro's training lair. The film is beautiful, no doubt, but it just
can't quite hit the mark, even if you do care about some of the
characters relationships in the film, as I did.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: 
John Eskow, Terry Rossio, and Ted Elliott. The character Zorro first
appeared in Johnston McCulley's serialized 1919 pulp fiction novel THE
CURSE OF THE CAPISTRANO. 
Synopsis:
The story takes place in 1800s California, then a part of Mexico. A
haggard but aristocratic martial arts master named Don Diego (Anthony
Hopkins) used to be the sly swashbuckling sword fighting superhero named
Zorro ("fox" in Spanish). After 20 years of languishing in an awful
prison the nobleman Don Diego finally escapes only to find out that his
infant daughter Elena, now a beautiful young woman (Catherine
Zeta-Jones), has been raised by his mortal enemy Don Rafael (Stuart
Wilson). Elena wrongly believes that she is Rafael's daughter, when in
fact Rafael murdered Elena's mother, Don Diego's wife.
Realizing that he is too old to destroy Don Rafael alone, Don Diego
trains a young bandit named Alejandro to inherit his superhero legacy
(the mask of Zorro), a job description which entails championing the
poor and sending corrupt colonial aristocrats scurrying fearfully back
to their haciendas with their tails between their legs - - through the
use of superior swordsmanship, horsemanship, and the whip. 
Similar to a James Bond movie, Alejandro/Zorro romances the bad guy's
girl, invades the rich guy's party, sneaks into the compound at night to
tangle with guards, gets into a stunt-filled chase (with horses), and
discovers how the bad guy plans to get the gold and take power. THE MASK
OF ZORRO even ends with a pop theme song. The difference is, James Bond
normally discovers the bad guy's master plan after getting captured and
tied up with the heroine, but Alejandro/Zorro does not. Also, James Bond
takes place in modern times, while the setting of THE MASK OF ZORRO is
colonial Mexico.
Will swashbucklers Don Diego and Alejandro save the girl and thwart Don
Rafael's greedy, power-hungry plan?
Opinion:
Zorro is a  character similar to both Robin Hood and Batman. Like Robin
Hood, Zorro champions the oppressed poor in a bygone era ruled by the
greedy rich. Like the popular Batman (or the earlier Scarlet Pimpernel),
Zorro has a secret identity whereby he poses as an affable aristocrat by
day but avenges injustice by night. Laughing at the thrill of danger,
Zorro shames the bad guys by defeating them and scratching big
embarrassing Zs onto their skin with his sword. 
When I was a kid, my siblings and I used to play Zorro with kite sticks
all the time. As a Zorro fan from way back, I find THE MASK OF ZORRO
enjoyable because it seamlessly weaves together action, romance, and
drama. Banderas in particular is excellent with the blade. His charm and
skillful swordplay, along with a more awkward slight tendency to slouch
and sideways forward roll, make him completely believable as a
Zorro-in-training. The other characters are good as well, from the sexy
but innocent Zeta-Jones to the elegant but out-of-breath Hopkins as the
paunchy, graying master. Aside from the dashing swordplay, an extra
choreography treat involves a tango-like ballroom sequence between the
dashing Alejandro and a passionate Elena. 
In THE MASK OF ZORRO attention to detail can be found in every facet of
the film, from the crisp, flamenco-style music and Spanish guitar, to
the period scenery, and design of the swords. The man responsible for
the excellent sword choreography in THE MASK OF ZORRO is swordsman Bob
Anderson. Anderson, who has been a swordmaster in Hollywood films for 45
years, is the man inside the Darth Vader costume in the STAR WARS movies
sword duels. He was also responsible, as swordmaster, for the exquisite
THE PRINCESS BRIDE and HIGHLANDER battles. Livestock coordinator Corky
Randall should also be commended for the detailed chase scenes and
horsemanship stunts in THE MASK OF ZORRO. 
The beginning of THE MASK OF ZORRO and the end of the film are very
exciting. THE MASK OF ZORRO comes very close to being a fantastic,
sweeping epic, but the middle sags slightly because the part where the
good guy stumbles upon the bad guy's master plan seems a bit stretched
out. In the middle - - for all Zorro's climbing around and detective
work - - he finds out that politician Don Rafael's earthshakingly evil
master scheme is to merely to make California an independent country by
purchasing it from Mexico. That doesn't seem like much of an evil idea,
considering that today the state of California's economy is larger than
that of every country in the world but five. So, as far as nefarious
master schemes go, Californian independence is too tame. Only twenty
minutes later, when Don Rafael decides to mercilessly kill off
imprisoned slaves, does the situation get dire enough to propel ZORRO.
This extra time causes the middle to appear stretched. But soon the
action starts back up again. Once the blades start flashing and the
protagonists rush to the rescue, all is well.
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Martin Campbell
Writers: Terry Rossio, Ted Elliott, and John Eskow
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matthew Letscher, Tony Amendola, Pedro Armendáriz Jr., L.Q. Jones,
Maury Chaykin, Julieta Rosen
"The Mask of Zorro" is like all of the old classic swashbucklers of the 20s
and 30s: action-packed, filled with lots of melodrama, seeming with
characters we either love or hate, marvelously entertaining, and instantly
forgettable.  I can't remember a lot of my reactions to this film as I
watched, and perhaps thinking about it a bit, I could probably point out
several things that I didn't like about it.  But all I remember is that for
2 hours plus, I was glued to the screen, swept up in the melodrama, and had
a big smile on my face the entire time.  Afterwards, it was more of a
grimace, but what are you gonna do?
Zorro is the latest of the classics of either TV or movies to be rehashed
by Hollywood and spit at the American Moviegoing Public, and luckily enough
Zorro's one that even I'd want to remake.  Basically, Zorro's a big
showman.  He doesn't just punish the wicked and return faith to the
downtrodden like a modern-day Mexican Robin Hood; he's got to do some
mugging, which is why he's such an interesting legend.  But this film
actually gives us not one but two Zorros, not to chose from, but to see the
torch being passed from one to another.
The film begins with the first Zorro, really a reclusive land owner named
Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins, sans Mexican accent), who rides to
town every now and then to help the poor and battle his tryannical
politician enemy, Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson, the baddie from
"Lethal Weapon 3," if you can at all remember him), then returns to his
villa on the edge of a cliff to be with his wife, Esperanza (Julieta
Rosen), and his newborn baby girl.  We are introduced to him when his fame
has already presided him, and after one big, very satisfying action
sequence towards the begining (glad to see Mr. Hopkins' stunt man is
finally getting some work), he is discovered by Rafael, his wife is
accidentally shot, his baby is stolen by Rafael, and he is sent to prison
for the rest of his life.
Jump about 20 years and Rafael is now returning to power again, this time
to end the long running war with Santa Anna over the property of
California.  Now enter con man Alejandro Murrieta (Anthony Hopkins), who
seeks revenge on an evil general of Montero's, Captain Harison Love
(Matthew Letscher), who kills his brother towards the beginning (sorta). 
Luckily, Diego has escaped from prison, and upon stumbling into Alejandro
at a bar, he decides that his fiery intensity, if properly trained, will
result in a redux of Zorro-dom, since he's way too old, but he still wants
to get revenge on Rafael and maybe introduce himself to his daughter, Elena
(a lusty and wonderfully-acting Catherine Zeta Jones), who's now much older
not to mention much more, well, buxom.
So goes the backstory to "The Mask of Zorro," and you can easily see how
melodramatic this all is, and how things will get even more melodramatic as
Alejandro learns how to fight and become suave (the film stages a massive
"Pygmalion"-esque sequence of him learning to fight, yet skips everything
about him learning to pass as a member of the Mexican aristocracy).  Things
become a tad more complicated as Alejandro starts posing as a politician of
sorts, and learns of some major political corruptedness.  Anyways, it's all
there just to involve the audience with a simple story of passionate
revenge, learning how to obtain dignity, and standing up against the
unjust.  And it's all just fun stuff because, unlike many films, the
characters we're supposed to like are very likable, and the characters
we're not supposed to like are very unlikable.  Just like the old movies.
The film's one major flaw may just be that it's trying to be everything,
and in the pursuit of telling a story, it denies the one thing that the
film really honestly needs: Zorro.  The character only pops up every now
and then, more and more towards the end, and the first times that Banderas
dons the costume and persona of the famous rebel are wonderfully awkward,
but eventually Banderas becomes Zorro.  When he finally gets it right, it's
just amazing stuff.  Banderas has proved himself to a few moviegoers,
mostly those who actually saw "Desperado" (one of the, like, billion films
he made in the fall of '95), that he's a suave, lovable, and wonderful
comic actor, capable of perhaps becoming one of the most likable graceful
action stars since Douglas Fairbanks (Sr.).  He has the kind of radiance
that lets the audience know that he's having lots of fun and the
gracefulness to be awe-inspiring and just plain lovable.  When he finally
discovers Zorro in himself, it just proves what the trailers suggested:
Antonio Banderas was born to play this role.  And he should do it agian,
for God's sake.
But the part of this film that really won me over was not Banderas's Zorro,
but Anthony Hopkins' Diego, a man who could have just been a simple
character, bent on revenge, but is instead portrayed as an emotionally
complex individual, thanks to Hopkins, who plays him with a mix of mystery
and sadness.  We never know what really made his character become Zorro in
the first place, but Hopkins hints at in his acting and makes everything
just seem real.  If Zorro is the reason you're seeing it in the first
place, Diego should be the reason you feel something emotionally.
However bold Hopkins' performance is, he never lets this film become heavy
handed, and his brooding never overblows the fact that this film is simply
just good old American entertainment.  There's no message, no dark
undertones, and the depth is kept to a minimum.  I could probably easily
complain that these are faults in the production and that I want to see big
budget Hollywood event pics, such as this, become "smarter"...but I won't,
because in all reality, I don't want all of them to be like that.  "The
Mask of Zorro" is not a dumb film, but it's not a terribly brilliant film
and that's all right.  It's escapism at its purist because it recognizes
that sometimes the most entertaining films are those that simply tell a
good story and tell it with interesting characters and lots of passion.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Michael Redman
The old adage "You can't go home again" is often especially true of one's
early childhood havens. Things tend to be smaller, less fascinating and not
quite as profound as memory would indicate.
Perhaps Zorro is one of those youthful memories best left alone. Out of the
several versions of the swashbuckling hero, Disney's Guy Williams was mine.
Hours were happily spent in front of the television watching the hero of old
California make his enemies look like fools. The current film pales in the
_recollection_ of those shows, although probably not compared to the actual
programs themselves.
Based loosely on Johnston McCulley's 1919 magazine serialization which was
brought to the screen a year later, this movie features two Zorros. We are
introduced to the first, Don Diego De La Vega (Anthony Hopkins), in 1812
during his last adventure. The evil governor Don Rafael Montero is ready to
execute innocent men to draw out his arch-foe. Zorro rides in, saves the men,
fights off an army, poses dramatically a number of times and escapes.
But all is not well. Montero discovers his secret identity and invades De La
Vega's home. During the battle, Zorro is captured and his beloved wife killed.
The governor then takes De La Vega's young daughter Elena to raise as his own.
Skip ahead twenty years. Montero returns from Spain with the grown Elena
(Catherine Zeta-Jones) and a plan to buy California from Mexico. Upon hearing
of this, De La Vega, languishing in a squalid prison, escapes. In a tavern he
runs into bandit Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas) who had befriended him
as a child.
Murrieta is seeking revenge against Captain Harrison Love (Matt Letscher) for
causing the death of his brother. Love is Montero's partner in his depraved
plan. The older Zorro takes on this young outlaw and trains him to be the new
masked avenger.
The film is a return to a simpler lighter adventure reminiscent of "Raiders
Of The Lost Ark". There's no dark brooding Bruce Wayne. It's all played for
action and laughs. The problem is that the action is listless and the laughs, forced.
The sword fighting is mostly filmed in medium shots resulting in a flat
experience. The scenes are formulaic and repetitive. Each fight looks like the
last. Zorro runs to the left and finds a group of soldiers. He runs to the
right and finds a group of soldiers. He runs back to the middle and fights
them all at once. Fifteen minutes later he does it again.
The comedy is played broadly and over and over. The young Zorro's problems
with his horse are slightly humorous the first time. The second and third are
less so.
Hopkins is the highlight of the film. His aging mentor is witty and
appealing. Banderas fares less well, but does what he can with the limited
role. Zeta-Jones certainly has a screen presence. Her sword fight with
Banderas which doubles as foreplay is a joy at least until it goes on too long.
Other viewers might find the recent Zorro dazzling. Me, I think I'll stick
with my memories.
[This appeared in the 8/6/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Antonio Banderas and Sir Anthony Hopkins.
Directed By Martin Campbell.
Running Time: 2 hours 15 minutes
Swashbuckling adventure that can be enjoyed by both children and adults.
Steven Spielberg may not have directed (he only executive produced) but his
touch certainly is evident in this movie. And he knows a money making winner
when he sees one. The Mask of Zorro has the hallmarks of a blockbuster: big
action, funny comedy, and the pacing of a rollercoaster. Hopkins plays Don
Diego de la Vega, otherwise known as Zorro. A fighter for the people, he is
eventually captured by Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), who also,
unintentionally, kills his wife. The film cuts to twenty years later, where
Vega still wants to Montero dead. However, he's far too old now, and trains
up thief Alejandro Murrieta (Banderas) to become the new Zorro. Banderas
motive? To avenge the death of his brother, who was killed at the hands of
Captain Love (Matthew Letscher) who rather tastefully keeps the head in a
jar, in one of the more graphic scenes in this family movie.
With the scene set, the movie goes on full blast, with sword fights a-plenty
and witty one liners. Banderas and Hopkins have a marvellous chemistry as
the two Zorro's, playing each other off with ease. Hopkins seems to come off
a little better, but Banderas does some excellent work. As the bad guys,
Wilson and Letscher seem one dimensional, but they go through the bad guy
shtick in an above average way. The audience does hate them, which can't be
bad. Catherine Zeta-Jones also pops up as Hopkins daughter, and although she
provides little more than the usual female lead, she delivers a charming,
but one note, performance. The chemistry is excellent between Banderas and
Jones. There's a delightful little scene where Banderas and Jones have a
sword fight, and every swipe an item of clothing gets slashed, until Jones
clothes fall off all together.
The director, fresh from the enjoyable GoldenEye (1995) handles the film
perfectly. The action is well done and fast paced, the comedy put across
well. The cast help a lot, but the direction is still outstanding. Although
the film is very long, the plot keeps chugging along, and there's barely a
dull moment. However, the film is a little over indulgent, and it could have
been trimmed. It manages to hold the attention, thankfully, and the
adventure and charm holds right up to the last reel.
Screenwriters John Eskow, Ted Elliot and Terry Rosio have unfortunately
written an cliched and one dimensional script. Although they've bought Zorro
up to date with big explosions and wild action, the plot itself is barely
existent. There's lots of little sub plots hanging around, but there's
nothing substantial to bring them all together. The main story seems to be
the fact that Rafael wants to 'buy' California using gold stolen from the
guy he's buying the land off. This sets up for a Temple of Doom type plot
where we see peasants slave driven into getting the gold from little mines.
However, this doesn't seem to appear until nearly over a hour into the film,
so the film is never quite sure where it's going.
In the end however, Zorro provides action and comedy in spades. It suitable
for everyone, so put the guilt behind, and put some more money into
Spielbergs bank account. You won't regret it.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
